By JOHN DEWEY 



* 

The Quest for Certainty 
Individualism Old and New 
Philosophy and Civilization 
Art as Experience 
Liberalism and Social Action 






LIBERALISM 

AND 

SOCIAL ACTION 

* 

By JOHN DEWEY 

The Page-Barbour Lectures 




MINTON BALCH 
BOOK 

G. P. Putnam’s Sons 

NEW YORK 



COPYRIGHT, 1935, BY JOHN DEWEY 



All rights reserved. This book, or parts thereof, must 
not be reproduced in any form without permission. 



PRINTED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 



TO THE MEMORY OF 
JANE ADDAMS 




PREFACE 

T HE chapters that follow were delivered as lectures 
at the University of Virginia upon the Page-Barbour 
Foundation. Some passages have been rewritten and 
the last chapter somewhat enlarged for publication. I 
wish to express my thanks to the friends, old and new, 
who did so much to make my stay at the University an 
enjoyed occasion. I wish also to thank Herbert W. 
Schneider and Sidney Hook for reading the manuscript 
and for criticism and comments of which I have freely 
availed myself. Needless to say, they are not responsible 
for what I have written. No reference to literature seems 
to be required, but I am glad to have an opportunity to 
express my sense of the incalculable worth of the En- 
cyclopaedia of the Social Sciences to all students. 

There are two requests I should like to make of read- 
ers of the volume, not to forestall criticism but that it 
may be rendered, perhaps, more pertinent. Three lec- 
tures do not permit one to say all he thinks, nor even all 
that he believes that he knows. Omission of topics and 
themes does not, accordingly, signify that I should have 
passed them by in a more extended treatment. I par- 
ticularly regret the enforced omission of reference to 

vii 



Vlll PREFACE 

the relation of liberalism to international affairs. I 
should also like to remind readers that not everything 
can be said in the same breath and that it is necessary 
to stress first one aspect and then another of the general 
subject. So I hope that what is said will be taken as a 
whole and also in comparison and contrast with alterna- 
tive methods of social action. 

New York City, 

May, 1935 . 



CONTENTS 



CHAPTER 

I THE HISTORY OF LIBERALISM 

II THE CRISIS IN LIBERALISM 

III RENASCENT LIBERALISM 



PAGE 

1 

28 

56 




* I * 



THE HISTORY OF 
LIBERALISM 

Ijiberalism has long been accustomed to onslaughts 
proceeding from those who oppose social change. It has 
long been treated as an enemy by those who wish to 
maintain the status quo . But today these attacks are mild 
in comparison with indictments proceeding from those 
who want drastic social changes effected in a twinkling 
of an eye, and who believe that violent overthrow of 
existing institutions is the right method of effecting the 
required changes. From current assaults, I select two 
as typical: “A liberal is one who gives lip approval to 
the grievances of the proletariat, but who at the critical 
moment invariably runs to cover on the side of the 
masters of capitalism.” Again, a liberal is defined as 
“one who professes radical opinions in private but who 
never acts upon them for fear of losing entree into the 
courts of the mighty and respectable.” Such statements 
might be cited indefinitely. They indicate that, in the 
minds of many persons, liberalism has fallen between 
two stools, so that it is conceived as the refuge of those 

unwilling to take a decided stand in the social conflicts 

1 



2 LIBERALISM AND 

going on. It is called mealy-mouthed, a milk-and-water 
doctrine and so on. 

Popular sentiment, especially in this country, is sub- 
ject to rapid changes of fashion. It was not a long time 
ago that liberalism was a term of praise; to be liberal 
was to be progressive, forward-looking, free from 
prejudice, characterized by all admirable qualities. I do 
not think, however, that this particular shift can be dis- 
missed as a mere fluctuation of intellectual fashion. 
Three of the great nations of Europe have summarily 
suppressed the civil liberties for which liberalism 
valiantly strove, and in few countries of the Continent 
are they maintained with vigor. It is true that none of 
the nations in question has any long history of devotion 
to liberal ideals. But the new attacks proceed from those 
who profess they are concerned to change not to preserve 
old institutions. It is well known that everything for 
which liberalism stands is put in peril in times of war. 
In a world crisis, its ideals and methods are equally 
challenged; the belief spreads that liberalism flourishes 
only in times of fair social weather. 

It is hardly possible to refrain from asking what 
liberalism really is; what elements, if any, of permanent 
value it contains, and how these values shall be main- 
tained and developed in the conditions the world now 
faces. On my own account, I have raised these ques- 
tions. I have wanted to find out whether it is possible 
for a person to continue, honestly and intelligently, to 
be a liberal, and if the answer be in the affirmative, 
what kind of liberal faith should be asserted today. 



SOCIAL ACTION 3 

Since I do not suppose that I am the only one who has 
put such questions to himself, I am setting forth the 
conclusions to which my examination of the problem 
has led me. If there is danger, on one side, of cowardice 
and evasion, there is danger on the other side of losing 
the sense of historic perspective and of yielding precipi- 
tately to short-time contemporary currents, abandon- 
ing in panic things of enduring and priceless value. 

The natural beginning of the inquiry in which we are 
engaged is consideration of the origin and past develop- 
ment of liberalism. It is to this topic that the present 
chapter is devoted. The conclusion reached from a brief 
survey of history, namely, that liberalism has had 
a chequered career, and that it has meant in practice 
things so different as to be opposed to one another, 
might perhaps have been anticipated without prolonged 
examination of its past. But location and description of 
the ambiguities that cling to the career of liberalism 
will be of assistance in the attempt to determine its 
significance for today and tomorrow. 

The use of the words liberal and liberalism to denote 
a particular social philosophy does not appear to occur 
earlier than the first decade of the nineteenth century. 
But the thing to which the words are applied is older. 
It might be traced back to Greek thought; some of its 
ideas, especially as to the importance of the free play 
of intelligence, may be found notably expressed in the 
funeral oration attributed to Pericles. But for the present 
purpose it is not necessary to go back of John Locke, 
the philosopher of the “glorious revolution” of 1688 . 



4 LIBERALISM AND 

The outstanding points of Locke’s version of liberalism 
are that governments are instituted to protect the rights 
that belong to individuals prior to political organization 
of social relations. These rights are those summed up a 
century later in the American Declaration of Independ- 
ence: the rights of life, liberty and the pursuit of happi- 
ness. Among the “natural” rights especially emphasized 
by Locke is that of property, originating, according to 
him, in the fact that an individual has “mixed” himself, 
through his labor, with some natural hitherto unappro- 
priated object. This view was directed against levies on 
property made by rulers without authorization from the 
representatives of the people. The theory culminated in 
justifying the right of revolution. Since governments are 
instituted to protect the natural rights of individuals, 
they lose claim to obedience when they invade and 
destroy these rights instead of safeguarding them: a 
doctrine that well served the aims of our forefathers in 
their revolt against British rule, and that also found an 
extended application in the French Revolution of 1789. 

The impact of this earlier liberalism is evidently 
political. Yet one of Locke’s greatest interests was to 
uphold toleration in an age when intolerance was rife, 
persecution of dissenters in faith almost the rule, and 
when wars, civil and between nations, had a religious 
color. In serving the immediate needs of England — and 
then those of other countries in which it was desired 
to substitute representative for arbitrary government — 
it bequeathed to later social thought a rigid doctrine 
of natural rights inherent in individuals independent 



SOCIAL ACTION 5 

of social organization. It gave a directly practical import 
to l lie older semi-theological and semi-metaphysical con- 
ceplion of natural law as supreme over positive law 
jiihI gave a new version of the old idea that natural 
hi w is the counterpart of reason, being disclosed by the 
imlural light with which man is endowed. 

The whole temper of this philosophy is individualistic 
in Lhe sense in which individualism is opposed to or- 
ganized social action. It held to the primacy of the 
individual over the state not only in time but in moral 
aulhority. It defined the individual in terms of liberties 
of ihought and action already possessed by him in some 
mysterious ready-made fashion, and which it was the 
sole business of the state to safeguard. Reason was also 
made an inherent endowment of the individual, ex- 
pressed in men’s moral relations to one another, but 
imL sustained and developed because of these relations. 

1 1 followed that the great enemy of individual liberty 
was ihought to be government because of its tendency 
to encroach upon the innate liberties of individuals, 
later liberalism inherited this conception of a natural 
antagonism between ruler and ruled, interpreted as a 
natural opposition between the individual and organized 
society. There still lingers in the minds of some the 
notion that there are two different “spheres” of action 
and of rightful claims; that of political society and 
Lhat of the individual, and that in the interest of the 
latter the former must be as contracted as possible. Not 
Lill the second half of the nineteenth century did the idea 
arise that government might and should be an instru- 



6 liberalism and 

ment for securing and extending the liberties of indi- 
viduals. This later aspect of liberalism is perhaps 
foreshadowed in the clauses of our Constitution that 
confer upon Congress power to provide for “public 
welfare” as well as for public safety.* 

What has already been said indicates that with Locke 
the inclusion of the economic factor, property, among 
I natural rights had a political animus. However, Locke 
1 at times goes so far as to designate as property every- 
thing that is included in “life, liberties and estates”; 
the individual has property in himself and in his life 
and activities; property in this broad sense is that which 
political society should protect. The importance attached 
to the right of property within the political area was 
without doubt an influence in the later definitely eco- 
nomic formulation of liberalism. But Locke was inter- 
ested in property already possessed. A century later 
industry and commerce were sufficiently advanced in 
Great Britain so that interest centered in production of 
wealth, rather than in its possession. The conception of 
labor as the source of right in property was employed 
not so much to protect property from confiscation by 
the ruler (that right was practically secure in England) 
as to urge and justify freedom in the use and invest- 
ment of capital and the right of laborers to move about 
and seek new modes of employment — claims denied by 

* Probably in the minds of the framers of the Constitution not much 
more was contemplated by this clause than the desirability of permit- 
ting Congress to make appropriations for roads, rivers and harbors. In 
subsequent practice, the power has not been used much beyond pro- 
vision of limited social services for those at an economic disadvantage. 



SOCIAL ACTION 7 

I lie common law that came down from semi-feudal 
conditions. The earlier economic conception may fairly 
In s called static; it was concerned with possessions and 
chI/iIcs. The newer economic conception was dynamic. 

I I was concerned with release of productivity and ex- 
change from a cumbrous complex of restrictions that 
had the force of law. The enemy was no longer the 
arhilrary special action of rulers. It was the whole sys- 
lem of common law and judicial practice in its adverse 
hearing upon freedom of labor, investment and ex- 
change. 

The transformation of earlier liberalism that took 
place because of this new interest is so tremendous that 
ils story must be told in some detail. The concern for' 
liberty and for the individual, which was the basis of 
1 s ockeian liberalism, persisted ; otherwise the newer 
theory would not have been liberalism. But liberty was 
given a very different practical meaning. In the end, 
the effect was to subordinate political to economic activ- 
ity; to connect natural laws with the laws of production 
and exchange, and to give a radically new significance 
to the earlier conception of reason. The name of Adam 
Smith is indissolubly connected with initiation of this 
transformation. Although he was far from being an 
unqualified adherent of the idea of laissez faire , he held 
that the activity of individuals, freed as far as possible 
from political restriction, is the chief source of social 
welfare and the ultimate spring of social progress. He 
held that there is a “natural” or native tendency in 
every individual to better each his own estate through 



S LIBERALISM AND 

» putting forth effort (labor) to satisfy his natural wants. 
Social welfare is promoted because the cumulative, but 
undesigned and unplanned, effect of the convergence of 
,a multitude of individual efforts is to increase the com- 
modities and services put at the disposal of men col- 
lectively, of society. This increase of goods and services 
creates new wants and leads to putting forth new modes 
of productive energy. There is not only a native impulse 
to exchange, to “truck , 59 but individuals are released by 
the processes of exchange from the necessity for labor 
in order to satisfy all of the individual’s own wants; 
through division of labor, productivity is enormously 
increased. Free economic processes thus bring about an 
endless spiral of ever increasing change, and through 
the guidance of an “invisible hand” (the equivalent of 
the doctrine of preestablished harmony so dear to the 
eighteenth century) the efforts of individuals for per- 
sonal advancement and personal gain accrue to the 
benefit of society, and create a continuously closer knit 
interdependence of interests. 

The ideas and ideals of the new political economy 
were congruous with the increase of industrial activity 
that was marked in England even before the invention 
of the steam engine. They spread rapidly. Their power 
was furthered when the great industrial and commercial 
expansion of England ensued in the wake of the substitu- 
tion of mechanical for human energy, first in textiles and 
then in other occupations. Under the influence of the in- 
dustrial revolution the old argument against political ac- 
tion as a social agency assumed a new form. Such action 



SOCIAL ACTION 9 

WJIS ,l0t only an invasion of individual liberty but it was 
in effect a conspiracy against tile causes that bring about 
su. ial progress. The Lockeian idea of natural laws took 
on 11 much more concrete, a more directly practical, 

Natural law was still regarded as something 

more fundamental than man-made law, which by com- 
purison is artificial. But natural laws lost their remote 
moral meaning. They were identified with the laws 
"I * rce industrial production and free commercial ex- 
change. Adam Smith, however, did not originate this 
laller idea. He took it over from the French physiocrats, 
who, as the name implies, believed in rule of social 
relations by natural law and who identified natural 
vvi 1 1, economic law. 

I 1 ranee was an agricultural country, and the economy 
of the physiocrats was conceived and formulated in the 
1 merest of agriculture and mining. Land, according to 
llicm, is the source of all wealth; from it comes ulti- 
mately all genuinely productive force. Industry, as dis- 
tinct from agriculture, merely reshapes what nature 
provides. The movement was essentially a protest against 
governmental measures that were impoverishing the agri- 
culturalist and that enriched idle parasites. But its 
underlying philosophy was the idea that economic laws 
are the true natural laws while other laws are artificial 
and hence to be limited in scope as far as possible. In 
an ideal society political organization will be modeled 
upon the economic pattern set by nature. Ex natura, jus. 

Locke had taught that labor, not land, is the source 
of wealth, and England was passing from an agrarian 



LIBERALISM AND 



10 

to an industrialized community. The French doctrine in 
its own form did not fit into the English scene. But 
there was no great obstacle against translating the under- 
lying ideal of the identity of natural law with economic 
law into a form suited to the needs of an industrial 
community. The shift from land to labor (the expendi- 
ture of energy for the satisfaction of wants) required 
only, from the side of the philosophy of economics, that 
attention be centered upon human nature, rather than 
upon physical nature. Psychological laws, based on 
human nature, are as truly natural as are any laws 
based on land and physical nature. Land is itself pro- 
ductive only under the influence of the labor put forth 
in satisfaction of intrinsic human wants. Adam Smith 
was not himself especially interested in elaborating a 
formulation of laws in terms of human nature. But he 
explicitly fell back upon one natural human tendency, 
sympathy, to find the basis for morals, and he used 
other natural impulses, the instincts to better one’s condi- 
tion and to exchange, to give the foundation of economic 
theory. The laws of the operations of these natural tend- 
encies, when they are freed from artificial restraints, 
are the natural laws governing men in their relations to 
one another. In individuals, the exercise of sympathy in 
accordance with reason (that is, in Smith’s conception, 
from the standpoint of an impartial spectator) is the 
norm of virtuous action. But government cannot appeal 
to sympathy. The only measures it can employ affect the 
motive of self-interest. It makes this appeal most effec- 
tively when it acts so as to protect individuals in the 



SOCIAL ACTION 

exercise of their natural self-interest. These ideas, im- 

l " n, 1 ,n ^ mith ’ were made ex PKcit by his successors: in 
|"ul >y t e classical school of economists and in part 

7. M Tl ham and the Mills, father and son. For a con- 
, .le P enod th ese two schools worked hand in hand 
Economists developed the principle of the free eco- 
-m,,c activity of individuals; since this freedom was 
identified with absence of governmental action, con- 

"f 311 T fer rr ith natUral libert * the result 
' ' ormulation of laissez faire liberalism. Bentham 

carried the same conception, though from a different 

° f VI6W ’ mt0 a vl gorous movement for reform of 
lie common law and judicial procedure by means of 
legislative action. The Mills developed the psychological 

,0glCal delation implicit in the theories of the 

economists and of Bentham. 

J begin with Bentham. The existing legal system was 
intimately bound up with a political system based upon 

, Pr " d ° mina nce of the great landed proprietors 
l.li lough the rotten borough system. The operation of 
*e new industrial forces in both production and 
exchange was checked and deflected at almost every 
I’omt by a mass of customs that formed the core 
of common law. Bentham approached the situation not 
I'om the standpoint of individual liberty but from the 
standpoint of the effect of these restrictions upon the 
nappmess enjoyed by individuals. Every restriction upon 
n herty is ipso facto a source of pain and a limitation 
o a pleasure that might otherwise be enjoyed. Hence 
effect was the same in the two doctrines as far as the 



12 LIBERALISM and 

rigteM province of ^ « 

Bentham’ s assault was aimed directly, not j 

fike the theory of the economists, upon everything m 
eating law and judicial procedure that miteed un- 
necessary pain and that limited the acquisition o 
pleasured by individuals. Moreover, his psychology 

converted the impulse to improve one's condition upon 

which Adam Smith had built into the doctrine A* 
desire for pleasure and aversion to pain are the sole 
f„ ces that govern human action. The psychological 
theory Implicit in the idea of industry and exchange 
controlled by desire for gain was then worked out upo 
the political and legal side. Moreover, the constant 
expansion of manufacturing and trade put t e orce 
a powerful class interest behind the new version of 
liberalism. This statement does not imply that the intel- 
lectual leaders of the new liberalism were themselve 
moved by hope of material gain. On the contrary, ey 
Tied a group animated by a 

in contrast with their professed theones. T J J 

detachment from the immediate interests of the nunket 
place liberated them from the narrowness and short 
sightedness that marked the trading class-a class a 
John Stuart Mill adverted to with even more bittern® 
than did Adam Smith. This emancipation enabled t 
detect and make articulate die nascent movemeids of 
Iheir time — a function that defines the genuine work of 
die intellectual class at any period. But they “ig « 
been as voices crying in the wilderness if wha, they 



SOCIAL ACTION 13 

l. infill had not coincided with the interests of a class 
lliat was constantly rising in prestige and power. 

According to Bentham, the criterion of all law and 
of every administrative effort is its effect upon the sum 
id happiness enjoyed by the greatest possible number. 
In calculating this sum, every individual is to count as 
ime and only as one. The mere formulation of the doc- 
It ine was an attack upon every inequality of status that 
had the sanction of law. In effect, it made the well-being 
of I lie individual the norm of political action in every 
area in which it operates. In effect, though not wholly in 
I ten I ham’s express apprehension, it transferred atten- 
lion from the well-being already possessed by indi- 
viduals to one they might attain if there were a radical 
change in social institutions. For existing institutions 
enabled a small number of individuals to enjoy their 
pleasures at the cost of the misery of a much greater 
number. While Bentham himself conceived that the 
changes to be made in legal and political institutions 
were mainly negative, such as abolition of abuses, cor- 
ruptions and inequalities, nevertheless (as we shall see 
later) there was nothing in his fundamental doctrine 
I hat stood in the way of using the power of government 
lo create, constructively and positively, new institutions 
if and when it should appear that the latter would con- 
I ribute more effectively to the well-being of individuals. 

Bentham’s best known work is entitled Principles of 
Morals and Legislation . In his actual treatment “morals 
and legislation” form a single term. It was the morals 
of legislation, of political action generally, with which 



14 LIBERALISM AND 

he occupied himself, his standard being the simple one 
of determination of its effect upon the greatest possible 
happiness of the greatest possible number, lie labored 
incessantly to expose the abuses of the existing legal 
system and its application in judicial procedures civil 
and criminals and in administration. He attacked these 
abuses, in his various works, in detail, one by one. But 
his attacks were cumulative in effect since he applied a 
single principle in his detailed criticism. He was, we 
may say, the first great muck-raker in the field of law. 
But he was more than that. Wherever he saw a defect, 
he proposed a remedy. He was an inventor in law and 
administration, as much so as any contemporary in 
mechanical production. He said of himself that his ambi- 
tion was to “extend the experimental method of reason- 
ing from the physical branch to the moral” — meaning, 
in common with English thought of the eighteenth cen- 
tury, by the moral the human. He also compared his 
own work with what physicists and chemists were doing 
in their fields in invention of appliances and processes 
that increase human welfare. That is, he did not limit 
his method to mere reasoning; the latter occurred only 
for the sake of instituting changes in actual practice. 
History shows no mind more fertile than his in invention 
of legal and administrative devices. Of him and his 
school, Graham Wallas said, “The fact that the fall 
from power of the British aristocracy in 1832 led neither 
to social revolution or administrative chaos at home, nor 
to the break-up of the new British Empire abroad was 
largely due to the political expedients local govern- 



SOCIAL ACTION 15 

mm l reform, open competition in the civil service, 
nr i n ) I i fie health and police administration, colonial 
nr I ( -government, Indian administrative reform — which 
Itrnll lam’s disciples either found in his writings, or 
developed, after his death, by his methods.” * 

The work of Bentham, in spite of fundamental defects 
in bis underlying theory of human nature, is a demon- 
M rat ion that liberalism is not compelled by anything in 
its own nature to be impotent save for minor reforms. 
Itentham’s influence is proof that liberalism can be a 
I lower in bringing about radical social changes: — pro- 
vided it combine capacity for bold and comprehensive so- 
ria I invention with detailed study of particulars and with 
eon rage in action. The history of the legal and adminis- 
trative changes in Great Britain during the first half of 
the nineteenth century is chiefly the history of Bentham 
and his school. I think there is something significant for 
the liberalism of today and tomorrow to be found in 
the fact that his group did not consist in any large 
measure of politicians, legislators or public officials. 
On the American principle of “Let George do it,” 
liberals in this country are given to supposing and 
hoping that some Administration when in power will 
lake the lead in formulating and executing liberal poli- 
cies. I know of nothing in history that justifies the belief 
and hope. A liberal program has to be developed, and 
in a good deal of particularity, outside of the immediate 
realm of governmental action and enforced upon public 

* Article on Bentham in the Encyclopedia of the Social Sciences, 
Vol. II, p. 519. 






16 LIBERALISM AND 

attention, before direct political action of a thorough- 
going liberal sort will follow. This is one lesson we 
have to learn from early nineteenth-century liberalism. 
Without a background of informed political intelligence, 
direct action in behalf of professed liberal ends may 
end in development of political irresponsibility. 

Bentham’s theory led him to the view that all or- 
ganized action is to be judged by its consequences, con- 
sequences that take effect in the lives of individuals. 
His psychology was rather rudimentary. It made him 
conceive of consequences as being atomic units of 
pleasures and pains that can be algebraically summed 
up. It is to this aspect of his doctrines that later writers, 
especially moralists, have chiefly devoted their critical 
attention. But this particular aspect of his theory, if we 
view it in the perspective of history, is an adventitious 
accretion. His enduring idea is that customs, institutions, 
laws, social arrangements are to be judged on the basis 
of their consequences as these come home to the indi- 
viduals that compose society. Because of his emphasis 
upon consequences, he made short work of the tenets 
of both of the two schools that had dominated, before 
his day, English political thought. He brushed aside, 
almost contemptuously, the conservative school that 
found the source of social wisdom in the customs and 
precedents of the past. This school has its counterpart 
in those empiricists of the present day who attack every 
measure and policy that is new and innovating on the 
ground that it does not have the sanction of experience, 
when what they really mean by “experience” is patterns 






SOCIAL ACTION 17 

nl mind that were formed in a past that no longer exists. 

Bill Bentham was equally aggressive in assault upon 
tli;il aspect of earlier liberalism which was based upon 
ill <! conception of inherent natural rights — following in 
lli is respect a clew given by David Hume. Natural rights 
fin 'I natural liberties exist only in the kingdom of mytho- 
logical social zoology. Men do not obey laws because 
lliry Lhink these laws are in accord with a scheme of 
imlural rights. They obey because they believe, rightly 
nr wrongly, that the consequences of obeying are upon 

I lie whole better than the consequences of disobeying. 

II I lie consequences of existing rule become too intoler- 
able, they revolt. An enlightened self-interest will induce 
a i ii lor not to push too far the patience of subjects. The 
enlightened self-interest of citizens will lead them to 
Oblain by peaceful means, as far as possible, the changes 
I bat; will effect a distribution of political power and 
I he publicity that will lead political authorities to work 
Co i* rather than against the interests of the people — a 
situation which Bentham thought was realized by govern- 
ment that is representative and based upon popular 
suffrage. But in any case, not natural rights but conse- 
quences in the lives of individuals are the criterion and 
measure of policy and judgment. 

Because the liberalism of the economists and the 
Benthamites was adapted to contemporary conditions in 
Great Britain, the influence of the liberalism of the 
school of Locke waned. By 1820 it was practically 
extinct. Its influence lasted much longer in the United 
States. We had no Bentham and it is doubtful whether 



18 LIBERALISM AND 

he would have had much influence if he had appeared. 
Except for movements in codification of law, it is hard 
to find traces of the influence of Bentham in this country. 
As was intimated earlier, the philosophy of Locke bore 
much the same relation to the American revolt of the 
colonies that it had to the British revolution of almost a 
century earlier. Up to, say, the time of the Civil War, 
the United States were predominantly agrarian. As they 
became industrialized, the philosophy of liberty of indi- 
viduals, expressed especially in freedom of contract, 
provided the doctrine needed by those who controlled 
the economic system. It was freely employed by the 
courts in declaring unconstitutional legislation that 
limited this freedom. The ideas of Locke embodied in 
the Declaration of Independence were congenial to our 
pioneer conditions that gave individuals the opportunity 
to carve their own careers. Political action was lightly 
thought of by those who lived in frontier conditions. A 
political career was very largely annexed as an adjunct 
to the action of individuals in carving their own careers. 
The gospel of self-help and private initiative was prac- 
ticed so spontaneously that it needed no special intellec- 
tual support. Finally, there was no background of 
feudalism to give special leverage to the Benthamite 
system of legal and administrative reform. 

The United States lagged more than a generation 
behind Great Britain in promotion of social legislation. 
Justice Holmes found it necessary to remind his fellow 
Justices that, after all, the Social Statics of Herbert 
Spencer had not been enacted into the American Con- 



SOCIAL ACTION 



19 

util in ion. Great Britain, largely under Benthamite influ- 
ence, built up an ordered civil service independent of 
pulii ical party control. With us, political emoluments, 
like, economic pecuniary rewards, went to the most enter- 
pi ising competitor; to the victor belong the spoils. The 
principle of the greatest good to the greatest number 
tended to establish in Great Britain the supremacy of 
national over local interests. The political history of the 
IJniled States is largely a record of domination by 
regional interests. Our fervor in law-making might be 
allied to Bentham’s principle of the “omnicompetence” 
id die legislative body. But we have never taken very 
Seriously the laws we make, while there has been little 
comparable in our history to the importance attached to 
administration by the English utilitarian school. 

I have mentioned two schools of liberalism in Great 
I h i lain, that of the economists and of the utilitarians. 
Ai first they walked the same path. The later history of 
I i I >eralism in that country is largely a matter of a grow- 
ing divergence, and finally of an open split. While 
Bentham personally was on the side of the classical 
economists, his principle of judgment by consequences 
lends itself to opposite application. Bentham himself 
urged a great extension of public education and of action 
in behalf of public health. When he disallowed the 
doctrine of inalienable individual natural rights, he 
removed, as far as theory is concerned, the obstacle to 
positive action by the state whenever it can be shown 
that the general well-being will be promoted by such 
action. Dicey in his Law and Opinion in England has 



20 LIBERALISM AND 

shown that collectivist legislative policies gained in force 
for at least a generation after the sixties. It was stimu- 
lated, naturally, by the reform bills that greatly broad- 
ened the basis of suffrage. The use of scientific method, 
even if sporadic and feeble, encouraged study of actual 
consequences and promoted the formation of legisla- 
tive policies designed to improve the consequences 
brought about by existing institutions. At all events, in 
connection with Benthamite influence, it greatly weak- 
ened the notion that Reason is a remote majestic power 
that discloses ultimate truths. It tended to render it an 
agency in investigation of concrete situations and in 
projection of measures for their betterment. 

I would not, however, give the impression that the 
trend away from individualistic to collectivistic liber- 
alism was the direct effect of utilitarianism. On the con- 
trary, social legislation was fostered primarily by Tories, 
who, traditionally, had no love for the industrialist class. 
Benthamite liberalism was not the source of factory 
laws, laws for the protection of child and women, pre- 
vention of their labor in mines, workmen’s compensation 
acts, employers’ liability laws, reduction of hours of 
labor, the dole, and a labor code. All of these measures 
went contrary to the idea of liberty of contract fostered 
by laissez faire liberalism. Humanitarianism, in alliance 
with evangelical piety and with romanticism, gave 
chief support, from the intellectual and emotional side, 
to these measures, as the Tory party was their chief 
political agent. No account of the rise of humanitarian 
sentiment as a force in creation of the new regulations 



SOCIAL ACTION 21 ' 

"I industry would be adequate that did not include the 
""incs of religious leaders drawn from both dissenters 
"i"l die Established Church. Such names as Wilberforce, 
« l/nkson, Zachary, Macaulay, Elizabeth Fry, Hannah 
Mine, as well as Lord Shaftesbury, come to mind. The 
nudes unions were gaining power and there was an 
"'live socialist movement, as represented by Robert 
< •wen. But in spite of, or along with, such movements, 
"<■ have to remember that liberalism is associated with 
f'eiierosity of outlook as well as with liberty of belief 
"ud action. Gradually a change came over the spirit and 
""'""ing of liberalism. It came surely, if gradually, to 
I"' disassociated from the laissez faire creed and to’ be 
Associated use of governmental action for aid 

l" I hose at economic disadvantage and for alleviation 
"I dieir conditions. In this country, save for a small 
of adherents to earlier liberalism, ideas and poli- 
cies of this general type have virtually come to define 
die meaning of liberal faith. American liberalism as 
illustrated in the political progressivism of the early 
| ""sent century has so little in common with British 
liberalism of the first part of the last century that it 
"lands in opposition to it. 

Lhe influence of romanticism, as exemplified in dif- 
Iercnt ways by Coleridge, Wordsworth, Carlyle and 
Kuskin, is worthy of especial note. These men were po- 
litically allied as a rule with the Tory party, if not ac- 
lively, at least in sympathy. The romanticists were all of 
them vigorous opponents of the consequences of the 
industrialization of England, and directed their assaults 



22 LIBERALISM AND 

at the economists and Benthamites whom they held largely 
responsible for these consequences. As against depend- 
ence upon uncoordinated individual activities, Coleridge 
emphasized the significance of enduring institutions. 
They, according to him, are the means by which men 
are held together in concord of mind and purpose, the 
only real social bond. They are the force by which human 
relations are kept from disintegrating into an aggregate 
of unconnected and conflicting atoms. His work and that 
of his followers was a powerful counterpoise to the anti- 
historic quality of the Benthamite school. The leading 
scientific interest of the nineteenth century came to be 
history, including evolution within the scope of history. 
Coleridge was no historian; he had no great interest in 
historical facts. But his sense of the mission of great 
historic institutions was profound. Wordsworth preached 
the gospel of return to nature, of nature expressed in 
rivers, dales and mountains and in the souls of simple 
folk. Implicitly and often explicitly he attacked indus- 
trialization as the great foe of nature, without and 
within. Carlyle carried on a constant battle against 
utilitarianism and the existing socio-economic order, 
which he summed up in a single phrase as “anarchy 
plus a constable.” He called for a regime of social 
authority to enforce social ties. Ruskin preached the 
social importance of art and joined to it a denunciation 
of the entire reigning system of economics, theoretical 
and practical. The esthetic socialists of the school of 
William Morris carried his teachings home to the 
popular mind. 



t 



SOCIAL ACTION 23 

romantic movement profoundly affected some 
' ';.' d gr "™ U P “ lho smallest sect of laUsez fuire 

brrnlism. The mtellectnal career of John Stuart Mill 
a valiant if unsuccessful struggle reconcile tlie 

"T derlved " a, “os« in infancy, from his father 
1 a feeling of their hollowness when compared with 

V “' U ' S ° f PO®* ° f ^ring historic institutions 

,h , e ,n " er life " portrayed by the romanticists. 

was >“ 1 y sensitive to the brutality of life about 
and its low intellectual level, and saw the relation 
a lwcen these two traits. At one time, he even went so 
as to say that he looked forward to the coming of 
age when the division of the produce of labor. 

° m “, de „ by c0ncert 011 “ acknowledged principle 
JUS ice. e asserted that existing institutions were 
""■rely provisional, and that the “laws” governing the 
distribution of wealth are not social but of man’s eon- 
1 "vance and are man’s to change. A long distance lies 
"'tween the philosophy embodied in such sayings and 
"" earlier assertion that “the sole end for which man- 
kind are warranted, individually or collectively, in 
mi erfenng with the freedom of action of any person is 
». -protection.’ The romantic school was the chief 
influence in effecting the change. 

There was in addition another intellectual force at 
work m changing the earlier liberalism, which openly 
professed libera] aims while at the same time attacking 
' irher liberalism. The name of Thomas Hill Green is 
not widely kn own outside of technical philosophical 
me es. But he was the leader in introducing into Eng. 



24 liberalism and 

land, in coherent formulation, the organic idealism that 
originated in Germany-and that originated there 
largely in reaction against the basic philosophy oi 
individualistic liberalism and individualistic empiricism. 
John Mill himself was greatly troubled by the com®, 
quences that followed from the psychological doctrine 
of associationalistn. Mental bonds in belief and purpose 
which are the product of external associations can easily 
be broken when circumstances change. The mora an 
social consequence is a threatened destruction of al 
stable bases of belief and social relationship. Green and 
his followers exposed this weakness m all phases of the 
atomistic philosophy that had developed under the 
alleged empiricism of the earlier liberal school. They 
criticized piece by piece almost every item of the theory 
of mind, knowledge and society that had grown out ol 
the teachings of Locke. They asserted that relations con- 
stitute the reality of nature, of mind and of society. 
But Green and his followers remained faithful, as the 
romantic school did not, to the ideals of liberalism; the 
conceptions of a common good as the measure of politi- 
cal organization and policy, of liberty as the most 
precious trait and very seal of individuality, of the 
claim of every individual to the full development of 
his capacities. They strove to provide unshakeable 
objective foundations in the very structure of things 
for these moral claims, instead of basing them upon 
the sandy ground of the feelings of isolated human 
beings For the relations that constitute the essentia 
nature of things are, according to them, the expression 



SOCIAL ACTION 25 

sl jin objective Reason and Spirit that sustains nature 
nml ihc human mind. 

The idealistic philosophy taught that men are held 
lugdlier by the relations that proceed from and that 
nmnifest an ultimate cosmic mind. It followed that the 
Ibis is of society and the state is shared intelligence and 
purpose, not force nor yet self-interest. The state is a 
moral organism, of w r hich government is one organ. 
Only by participating in the common intelligence and 
tJuning in the common purpose as it works for the 
common good can individual human beings realize their 
line individualities and become truly free. The state is 
luil one organ among many of the Spirit and Will that 
holds all things together and that makes human beings 
members of one another. It does not originate the moral 
claim of individuals to the full realization of their 
potentialities as vehicles of objective thought and pur- 
pose. Moreover, the motives it can directly appeal to 
are not of the highest kind. But it is the business of the 
slate to protect all forms and to promote all modes of 
1 1 uinan association in which the moral claims of the 
members of society are embodied and which serve as 
l lie means of voluntary self-realization. Its business is 
negatively to remove the obstacles that stand in the way 
of individuals coming to consciousness of themselves 
for what they are, and positively to promote the cause 
of public education. Unless the state does this work 
i I is no state. These philosophical liberals pointed out 
I he restrictions, economic and political, which prevent 
many, probably the majority, of individuals from the 



26 LIBERALISM AND 

voluntary intelligent action by which they may become 
what they are capable of becoming. The teachings of 
this new liberal school affected the thoughts and actions 
of multitudes who did not trouble themselves to under- 
stand the philosophical doctrine that underlay it. They 
served to break down the idea that freedom is some- 
thing that individuals have as a ready-made possession, 
and to instill the idea that it is something to be achieved, 
while the possibility of the achievement was shown 
to be conditioned by the institutional medium in which 
an individual lives. These new liberals fostered the idea 
that the state has the responsibility for creating institu- 
tions under which individuals can effectively realize 
the potentialities that are theirs. 

Thus from various sources and under various influ- 
ences there developed an inner split in liberalism. This 
cleft is one cause of the ambiguity from which liber- 
alism still suffers and which explains a growing impo- 
tency. There are still those who call themselves liberals 
who define liberalism in terms of the old opposition 
between the province of organized social action and the 
province of purely individual initiative and effort. In 
the name of liberalism they are jealous of every exten- 
sion of governmental activity. They may grudgingly 
concede the need of special measures of protection and 
alleviation undertaken by the state at times of great 
social stress, but they are the confirmed enemies of 
social legislation (even prohibition of child labor), as 
standing measures of political policy. Wittingly or un- 
wittingly, they still provide the intellectual system of 



SOCIAL ACTION 27 

Ipologetics for the existing economic regime, which 
lliey strangely, it would seem ironically, uphold as a 
Mgime of individual liberty for all. 

I hit the majority who call themselves liberals today 
are committed to the principle that organized society 
miisL use its powers to establish the conditions under 
wliich the mass of individuals can possess actual as 
(lisiinct from merely legal liberty. They define their 
liberalism in the concrete in terms of a program of 
measures moving toward this end. They believe that 
I lie conception of the state which limits the activities 
°l latter to keeping order as between individuals 
11,1(1 to securing redress for one person when another 
person infringes the liberty existing law has given him, 
is in effect simply a justification of the brutalities and 
inequities of the existing order. Because of this internal 
division within liberalism its later history is wavering 
and confused. The inheritance of the past still causes 
many liberals, who believe in a generous use of the 
powers of organized society to change the terms on 
wliich human beings associate together, to stop short 
with merely protective and alleviatory measures — a fact 
I bat partly explains why another school always refers 
to 6 reform” with scorn. It will be the object of the next 
chapter to portray the crisis in liberalism, the impasse 
m which it now almost finds itself, and through criticism 
of the deficiences of earlier liberalism to suggest the 
way in which liberalism may resolve the crisis, and 
emerge as a compact, aggressive force. 



* II * 



THE CRISIS IN 
LIBERALISM 

The net effect of the struggle of early liberals to 
^emancipate individuals from restrictions imposed upon 
jthem by the inherited type of social organization was 
to pose a problem, that of a new social organization. The 
ideas of liberals set forth in the first third of the nine- 
teenth century were potent in criticism and in analysis. 
They released forces that had been held in check. But 
analysis is not construction, and release of force does 
not of itself give direction to the force that is set free. 
Victorian optimism concealed for a time the crisis at 
which liberalism had arrived. But when that optimism 
vanished amid the conflict of nations, classes and races 
characteristic of the latter part of the nineteenth century 
— a conflict that has grown more intense with the passing 
years — the crisis could no longer be covered up. The 
beliefs and methods of earlier liberalism were ineffec- 
tive when faced with the problems of social organiza- 
tion and integration. Their inadequacy is a large part 
of belief now so current that all liberalism is an out- 
moded doctrine. At the same time, insecurity and un- 

28 



SOCIAL ACTION 29 

certainty in belief and purpose are powerful factors in 
generating dogmatic faiths that are profoundly hostile 
li» everything to which liberalism in any possible for- 
mulation is devoted. 

In a longer treatment, the crisis could be depicted in 
lerms of the career of John Stuart Mill, during a period 
when the full force of the crisis was not yet clearly 
manifest. He records in his Autobiography that, as early 
as 1826 , he asked himself this question: “Suppose that 
all your objects in life were realized: that all the 
changes in institutions and opinions which you are look- 
ing forward to, could be completely effected at this 
very instant: would this be a great joy and happiness 
lo you?” His answer was negative. The struggle for 
liberation had given him the satisfaction that comes 
Irom active struggle. But the prospect of the goal 
attained presented him with a scene in which something 
unqualifiedly necessary for the good life was lacking. 
He found something profoundly empty in the spectacle 
he imaginatively faced. Doubtless physical causes had 
something to do with his growing doubt as to whether 
life would be worth living were the goal of his ambitions 
realized; sensitive youth often undergoes such crises. 
But he also felt that there was something inherently 
superficial in the philosophy of Bentham and his father. 
This philosophy now seemed to him to touch only the 
externals of life, but not its inner springs of personal 
sustenance and growth. I think it a fair paraphrase to 
say that he found himself faced with only intellectual 
abstractions. Criticism has made us familiar with the 



30 LIBERALISM AND 

abstraction known as the economic man. The utilitarians 
added the abstraction of the legal and political man. 
But somehow they had failed to touch man himself. Mill 
first found relief in the fine arts, especially poetry, as a 
medium for the cultivation of the feelings, and reacted 
against Benthamism as exclusively intellectualistic, a 
theory that identified man with a reckoning machine. 
Then under the influence of Coleridge and his disciples 
he learned that institutions and traditions are indis- 
pensable to the nurture of what is deepest and most 
worthy in human life. Acquaintance with Comte’s 
philosophy of a future society based on the organization 
of science gave him a new end for which to strive, the 
institution of a kind of social organization in which 
there should be some central spiritual authority. 

The life-long struggle of Mill to reconcile these ideas 
with those which were deeply graven in his being by 
his earlier Benthamism concern us here only as a symbol 
of the enduring crisis of belief and action brought 
about in liberalism itself when the need arose for uniting 
earlier ideas of freedom with an insistent demand for 
social organization, that is, for constructive synthesis 
in the realm of thought and social institutions. The 
problem of achieving freedom was immeasurably 
widened and deepened. It did not now present itself 
as a conflict between government and the liberty of 
individuals in matters of conscience and economic 
action, but as a problem of establishing an entire social 
order, possessed of a spiritual authority that would 
nurture and direct the inner as well as the outer life of 



SOCIAL ACTION gj 

"wlividuals. The problem of science was no longer 
"KTcly technological applications for increase of ma- 
lmi| l Productivity, hut imbuing the minds of indi- 
viduals with the spirit of reasonableness, fostered by 
?'/ ciaI organization and contributing to its development. 
,,ie P ro Wem of democracy was seen to be not solved, 
hardly more than externally touched, by the establish- 
ment of universal suffrage and representative govern- 
ment. As Havelock Ellis has said, “We see now that 
ili<; vote and the ballot-box do not make the voter free 
(mm even external pressure; and, which is of much 
more consequence, they do not necessarily free him from 
Ins own slavish instincts.” The problem of democracy 
becomes the problem of that form of social organiza- 
Imn, extending to all the areas and ways of living, in 
which the powers of individuals shall not be merely 
icleased from mechanical external constraint but shall 
l»c fed, sustained and directed. Such an organization 
demands much more of education than general school- 
ing, which without a renewal of the springs of purpose 
and desire becomes a new mode of mechanization and 
I ormalization, as hostile to liberty as ever was govern- 
mental constraint. It demands of science much more 
Ilian external technical application — which again leads 
lo mechanization of life and results in a new kind of 
enslavement. It demands that the method of inquiry, of 
discrimination, of test by verifiable consequences,’ be 
naturalized m all the matters, of large and of detailed 
scope, that arise for judgment. 

The demand for a form of social organization that 



32 LIBERALISM AND 

should include economic activities but yet should con- 
k vert them into servants of the development of the higher 
j capacities of individuals, is one that earlier liberalism 
' did not meet. If we strip its creed from adventitious ele- 
ments, there are, however, enduring values for which 
earlier liberalism stood. These values are liberty; the 
development of the inherent capacities of individuals 
made possible through liberty, and the central role of 
free intelligence in inquiry, discussion and expression. 
But elements that were adventitious to these values col- 
ored every one of these ideals in ways that rendered 
them either impotent or perverse when the new problem 
of social organization arose. 

Before considering the three values, it is advisable to 
note one adventitious idea that played a large role in 
the later incapacitation of liberalism. The earlier liberals 
[lackedjiistoric sense and interest. For a while this lack 
had an immediate pragmatic value. It gave liberals a 
powerful weapon in their fight with reactionaries. For 
it enabled them to undercut the appeal to origin, prec- 
edent and past history by which the opponents of social 
change gave sacrosanct quality to existing inequities 
and abuses. But disregard of history took its revenge. 
It blinded the eyes of liberals to the fact that their 
own special interpretations of liberty, individuality and 
intelligence were themselves historically conditioned, and 
were relevant only to their own time. They put forward 
their ideas as immutable truths good at all times and 
places ; they had no idea of historic relativity, either in 
general or in its application to themselves. 



SOCIAL ACTION 33 

When their ideas and plans were projected they were 
mi attack upon the interests that were vested in estab- 
lished institutions and that had the sanction of custom. 
The new forces for which liberals sought an entrance 
were incipient; the status quo was arrayed against their 
release. By the middle of the nineteenth century the 
eoiitemporary scene had radically altered. The economic 
and political changes for which they strove were so 
largely accomplished that they had become in turn the 
v« sled interest, and their doctrines, especially in the 
loi in of laissez faire liberalism, now provided the intel- 
lectual justification of the status quo. This creed is still 
powerful in this country. The earlier doctrine of “natural 
1 1 glits, superior to legislative action, has been given a 
definitely economic meaning by the courts, and used by 
judges to destroy social legislation passed in the inter- 
est of a real, instead of purely formal, liberty of con- 
tract. Under the caption of “rugged individualism” it 
inveighs against all new social policies. Beneficiaries of 
die established economic regime band themselves to- 
gether in what they call Liberty Leagues to perpetuate 
I he harsh regimentation of millions of their fellows. I 
do not imply that resistance to change would not have 
appeared if it had not been for the doctrines of earlier 
liberals. But had the early liberals appreciated the 
historic relativity of their own interpretation of the 
meaning of liberty, the later resistance would certainly 
have been deprived of its chief intellectual and moral 
support. The tragedy is that although these liberals were 
the sworn foes of political absolutism, they were them- 



34 liberalism and 

selves absolutists in the social creed they formulated. 

This statement does not mean, of course, that they 
were opposed to social change; the opposite is evi- 
dently the case. But it does mean they held that bene- 
ficial social change can come about in but one way, the 
way of private economic enterprise, socially undirected, 
based upon and resulting in the sanctity of private 
property— that is to say, freedom from social control. 
So today those who profess the earlier type of liber- 
alism ascribe to this one factor all social betterment 
that has occurred; such as the increase in productivity 
and improved standards of living. The liberals did not 
try to prevent change, but they did try to limit its course 
to a single channel and to immobilize the channel. 

If the early liberals had put forth their special inter- 
pretation of liberty as something subject to historic rela- 
tivity they would not have frozen it into a doctrine to he 
applied at all times under all social circumstances. 
Specifically, they would have recognized that effective 
liberty is a function of the social conditions existing 
at any time. If they had done this, they would have 
known that as economic relations became dominantly 
controlling forces in setting the pattern of human rela- 
tions, the necessity of liberty for individuals which they 
proclaimed will require social control of economic 
forces in the interest of the great mass of individu- 
als. Because the liberals failed to make a distinction 
between purely formal or legal liberty and effec- 
tive liberty of thought and action, the history of the 
last one hundred years is the history of non-fulfillment 



SOCIAL ACTION 35 

uf l heir predictions. It was prophesied that a regime of 
feunomic liberty would bring about interdependence 
nmong nations and consequently peace. The actual scene 
I m s been marked by wars of increasing scope and 
destructiveness. Even Karl Marx shared the idea that 
I lie new economic forces would destroy economic nation- 
alism and usher in an era of internationalism. The dis- 
play of exacerbated nationalism now characterizing the 
wo rid is a sufficient comment. Struggle for raw materials 
and markets in backward countries, combined with for- 
eign financial control of their domestic industrial de- 
v < ■ lopment, has been accompanied by all kinds of 
devices to prevent access of other advanced nations to 
die national market-place. 

The basic doctrine of early economic liberals was 
diat the regime of economic liberty as they conceived 
il, would almost automatically direct production through 
competition into channels that would provide, as ef- 
fectively as possible, socially needed commodities and 
services. Desire for personal gain early learned that it 
could better further the satisfaction of that desire by 
stifling competition and substituting great combinations 
of non-competing capital. The liberals supposed the 
motive of individual self-interest would so release pro- 
ductive energies as to produce ever-increasing abun- 
dance. They overlooked the fact that in many cases 
personal profit can be better served by maintaining 
artificial scarcity and by what Veblen called systematic 
sabotage of production. Above all, in identifying the 
extension of liberty in all of its modes with extension of 



36 LIBERALISM AND 

their particular brand of economic liberty, they com- 
pletely failed to anticipate the bearing of private control 
of the means of production and distribution upon the 
effective liberty of the masses in industry as well as m 
cultural goods. An era of power possessed by the few 
took the place of the era of liberty for all envisaged by 
the liberals of the early nineteenth century. 

These statements do not imply that these liberals 
should or could have foreseen the changes that would 
occur, due to the impact of new forces of production. 
The point is that their failure to grasp the historic posi- 
tion of the interpretation of liberty they put forth served 
later to solidify a social regime that was a chief ob- 
stacle to attainment of the ends they professed. One 
aspect of this failure is worth especial mention. No one 
has ever seen more clearly than the Benthamites that the 
political self-interest of rulers, if not socially checked 
and controlled, leads to actions that destroy liberty for 
the mass of people. Their perception of this fact was a 
chief ground for their advocacy of representative gov- 
ernment, for they saw in this measure a means by which 
the self-interest of the rulers would be forced into con- 
formity with the interests of their subjects. But they 
had no glimpse of the fact that private control of the 
new forces of production, forces which affect the life 
of every one, would operate in the same way as private 
unchecked control of political power. They saw the need 
of new legal institutions, and of different political con- 
ditions as a means to political liberty. But they failed 
to perceive that social control of economic forces is 



SOCIAL ACTION 



37 

0<|iially necessary if anything approaching economic 
<’<|uality and liberty is to be realized. 

IJentham did believe that increasing equalization of 
economic fortunes was desirable. He justified his opin- 
ion of its desirability on the ground of the greater 
happiness of the greater number: to put the matter 
crudely, the possession of ten thousand dollars by a 
lliousand persons would generate a greater sum of hap- 
piness than the possession of ten million dollars by 
one person. But he believed that the regime of economic 
liberty would of itself tend in the direction of greater 
equalization. Meantime, he held that “time is the only 
mediator,” and he opposed the use of organized social 
power to promote equalization on the ground that such 
action would disturb the “security” that is even a greater 
condition of happiness than is equality. 

When it became evident that disparity, not equality, 
was the actual consequence of laissez faire liberalism, 
defenders of the latter developed a double system of 
justifying apologetics. Upon one front, they fell hack 
upon tlie natural inequalities of individuals in psycho- 
logical and moral make-up, asserting that inequality 
of fortune and economic status is the “natural” and 
justifiable consequence of the free play of these inherent 
differences. Herbert Spencer even erected this idea into 
a principle of cosmic justice, based upon the idea of the 
proportionate relation existing between cause and effect. 

I fancy that today there are hut few who are hardy 
enough, even admitting the principal of natural inequal- 
ities, to assert that the disparities of property and in- 



LIBERALISM AND 



38 

come bear any commensurate ratio to inequalities in tbr 
native constitution of individuals. If we suppose thal 
there is in fact such a ratio, the consequences are so 
intolerable that the practical inference to be drawn is 
that organized social effort should intervene to prevenl 
the alleged natural law from taking full effect. 

The other line of defense is unceasing glorification 
of the virtues of initiative, independence, choice and 
responsibility, virtues that center in and proceed from 
individuals as such. I am one who believes that we need 
more, not fewer, “rugged individuals” and it is in the 
name of rugged individualism that I challenge the argu- 
ment. Instead of independence, there exists parasitica] 
dependence on a wide scale — witness the present need 
for the exercise of charity, private and public, on a vast 
scale. The current argument against the public dole on 
the ground that it pauperizes and demoralizes those who 
receive it has an ironical sound when it comes from 
those who would leave intact the conditions that cause 
the necessity for recourse to the method of support of 
millions at public expense. Servility and regimentation 
are the result of control by the few of access to means 
of productive labor on the part of the many. An even 
more serious objection to the argument is that it con- 
ceives of initiative, vigor, independence exclusively in 
terms of their least significant manifestation. They 
are limited to exercise in the economic area. The 
meaning of their exercise in connection with the cul- 
tural resources of civilization, in such matters as com- 
panionship, science and art, is all but ignored. It is at 



SOCIAL ACTION 39 

llxs last point in particular that the crisis of liberalism 

! he “f d for a ^consideration of it in terms of the 

h< mune lheration of individuals are most evident The 
enormous exaggeration of material and materialistic 
economics that now prevails at the expense of cultural 
values, is not itself the result of earlier liberalism. But 
as was illustrated in the personal crisis through which 
passed, it is an exaggeration which is favored, both 
intellectually and morally, by fixation of the early 

lbs fact induces a natural transition from the con-^ 
cept of liberty to that of the individual. The underlying 
philosophy and psychology of earlier liberalism led to 
11, Conception of individuality as something ready-made 
already possessed, and needing only the removal of cer- 
“n ! fS aI restrictions to come into full play. It was not 
conceived as a moving thing, something that is attained 
on y y continuous growth. Because of this failure the 

timrw 61106 ^ l-t °r individuaIs U P°« social condi- 
... 1 38 ™ ade J ltUe of> 11 IS ^ue that some of the early 

iberals, like John Stuart Mill, made much of the effect 
o circumstances” in producing differences among in- 
dividuals. But the use of the word and idea of “circum- 
stances is significant. It suggests— and the context 
bears out the suggestion-that social arrangements and 
institutions were thought of as things that operate from 
without, not entering in any significant way into the 
internal make-up and growth of individuals. Social ar- 
rangements were treated not as positive forces but as 
ex ernal limitations. Some passages in Mill’s discussion 



40 liberalism and 

of the logic of the social sciences are pertinent. “Men 
in a state of society are still men; their actions and 
passions are obedient to the laws of individual human 
nature. Men are not, when brought together, converted 
into a different kind of substance, as hydrogen and 
oxygen differ from water. . . . Human beings in society 
have no properties but those which are derived from, 
and may be resolved into, the laws of individual men. 
And again he says: “The actions and feelings of men in 
the social state are entirely governed by psychological 
laws.” * 

There is an implication in these passages that liberals 
will be the last to deny. This implication is directly 
in line with Mill’s own revolt against the creed in which 
he was educated. As far as the statements are a warning 
against attaching undue importance to merely external 
institutional changes, to changes that do not enter into 
the desires, purposes and beliefs of the very constitu- 
tion of individuals, they express an idea to which liber- 
alism is committed by its own nature. But Mill means 
something at once less and more than this. While he 
would probably have denied that he held to the notion 
of a state of nature in which individuals exist prior to 
entering into a social state, he is in fact giving a psy- 
chological version of that doctrine. Individuals, it is 
implied, have a full-blown psychological and moral na- 
ture, having its own set laws, independently of their 
association with one another. It is the psychological laws 
of this isolated human nature from which social laws are 
* The quotations are from Mill’s Logic, Book VI, chs. vii and ix. 



SOCIAL ACTION 41 

derived and into which they may be resolved. His own 
illustration of water in its difference from hydrogen 
mid oxygen on separation might have taught him better, 
if it had not been for the influence of a prior dogma. 
That the human infant is modified in mind and character 
by his connection with others in family life and that 
I lie modification continues throughout life as his con- 
nections with others broaden, is as true as that hydrogen 
is modified when it combines with oxygen. If we gen- 
eralize the meaning of this fact, it is evident that while 
(here are native organic or biological structures that 
remain fairly constant, the actual “laws” of human 
nature are laws of individuals in association, not of 
beings in a mythical condition apart from association. 
In other words, liberalism that takes its profession of 
the importance of individuality with sincerity must be 
deeply concerned about the structure of human asso- 
ciation. For the latter operates to affect negatively 
and positively, the development of individuals. Because 
a wholly unjustified idea of opposition between indi- 
viduals and society has become current, and because its 
currency has been furthered by the underlying philos- 
ophy of individualistic liberalism, there are many who 
in fact are working for social changes such that rugged 
individuals may exist in reality, that have become con- 
temptuous of the very idea of individuality, while others 
support in the name of individualism institutions that 
militate powerfully against the emergence and growth 
of beings possessed of genuine individuality. 

It remains to say something of the third enduring 



42 LIBERALISM AND 

value in the liberal creed: — intelligence. Grateful recog- 
nition is due early liberals for their valiant battle in 
behalf of freedom of thought, conscience, expression 
and communication. The civil liberties we possess, how- 
ever precariously today, are in large measure the fruil 
of their efforts and those of the French liberals who 
engaged in the same battle. But their basic theory as to 
the nature of intelligence is such as to offer no sure 
foundation for the permanent victory of the cause they 
espoused. They resolved mind into a complex of ex- 
ternal associations among atomic elements, just as they 
resolved society itself into a similar compound of ex- 
ternal associations among individuals, each of whom 
has his own independently fixed nature. Their psy- 
chology was not in fact the product of impartial inquiry 
into human nature. It was rather a political weapon 
devised in the interest of breaking down the rigidity of 
dogmas and of institutions that had lost their relevancy. 
Mill’s own contention that psychological laws of the 
kind he laid down were prior to the laws of men living 
and communicating together, acting and reacting upon 
one another, was itself a political instrument forged in 
the interest of criticism of beliefs and institutions that 
he believed should be displaced. The doctrine was po- 
tent in exposure of abuses; it was weak for constructive 
purposes. Bentham’s assertion that he introduced the 
method of experiment into the social sciences held good 
as far as resolution into atoms acting externally upon 
one another, after the Newtonian model, was concerned. 
It did not recognize the place in experiment of compre- 



SOCIAL ACTION 43 

li«‘nsive social ideas as working hypotheses in direction 
of action. 

The practical consequence was also the logical one. 
When conditions had changed and the problem was one 
»l constructing social organization from individual units 
lhat had been released from old social ties, liberalism 
fell upon evil times. The conception of intelligence as 
something that arose from the association of isolated 
elements, sensations and feelings, left no room for far- 
reaching experiments in construction of a new social 
order. It was definitely hostile to everything like col- 
lective social planning. The doctrine of laissez faire was •» 
applied to intelligence as well as to economic action, 
although tlie conception of experimental method in sci- 
1 nee demands a control by comprehensive ideas, pro- 
jected in possibilities to he realized by action. Scientific 
method is as much opposed to go-as-you-please in intel- 
lectual matters as it is to reliance upon habits of mind 
whose sanction is that they were formed by “expert- 
ence” m the past. The theory of mind held by the early 
liberals advanced beyond dependence upon the past but 
U did not arrive at the idea of experimental and construe- 
live intelligence. 

The dissolving atomistic individualism of the liberal 
school evoked by way of reaction the theory of organic 
objective mind. But the effect of the latter theory em- 
bodied in idealistic metaphysics was also hostile to 
intentional social planning. The historical march of 
mind, embodied in institutions, was believed to account 
for social changes— all in its own good time. A similar 



44 LIBERALISM AN1) 

conception was fortified by the interest in history and in 
evolution so characteristic of the later nineteenth cen- 
tury. The materialistic philosophy of Spencer joined 
hands with the idealistic doctrine of Hegel in throwing 1 1 ie 
burden of social direction upon powers that are beyond 
deliberate social foresight and planning. The economic 
dialectic of history, substituted by Marx for the Hege- 
lian dialectic of ideas, as interpreted by the social - 
democratic party in Europe, was taken to signify an 
equally inevitable movement toward a predestined goal. 
Moreover, the idealistic theory of objective spirit pro- 
vided an intellectual justification for the nationalisms 
that were rising. Concrete manifestation of absolute 
mind was said to be provided through national states. 
Today, this philosophy is readily turned to the support 
of the totalitarian state. 

The crisis in liberalism is connected with failure to 
develop and lay hold of an adequate conception of intel- 
ligence integrated with social movements and a factor in 
giving them direction. We cannot mete out harsh blame 
to the early liberals for failure to attain such a concep- 
tion. The first scientific society for the study of anthro- 
pology was founded the year in which Darwin’s Origin 
of Species saw the light of day. I cite this particular 
fact to typify the larger fact that the sciences of society, 
the controlled study of man in his relationships, are the 
product of the later nineteenth century. Moreover, these 
disciplines not only came into being too late to influence 
the formulation of liberal social theory, but they them- 
selves were so much under the influence of the more 



SOCIAL ACTION 45 

advanced physical sciences that it was supposed that 
llieir findings were of merely theoretic import. By this 
Hlalcment, I mean that although the conclusions of the 
Hocial disciplines were about man, they were treated as 
1 1 they were of the same nature as the conclusions of 
/physical science about remote galaxies of stars. Social 
\ m| d historical inquiry is in fact a part of the social 
process itself, not something outside of it. The conse- 
quence of not perceiving this fact was that the conclu- 
sions of the social sciences were not made (and still are 
not made in any large measure) integral members of 
a program of social action. When the conclusions of 
inquiries that deal with man are left outside the program 
of social action, social policies are necessarily left 
without the guidance that knowledge of man can provide, 
and that it must provide if social action is not to be 
directed either by mere precedent and custom or else 
by the happy intuitions of individual minds. The social 
conception of the nature and work of intelligence is still 
immature; in consequence, its use as a director of social 
action is inchoate and sporadic. It is the tragedy of 
earlier liberalism that just at the time when the problem 
of social organization was most urgent, liberals could 
bring to its solution nothing but the conception that 
intelligence is an individual possession. 

It is all but a commonplace that today physical 
knowledge and its technical applications have far out- 
run our knowledge of man and its application in social 
invention and engineering. What I have just said indi- 
cates a deep source of the trouble. After all, our 



46 LIBERALISM AND 

accumulated knowledge of man and his ways, furnished 
by anthropology, history, sociology and psychology, is 
vast, even though it be sparse in comparison with our 
knowledge of physical nature. But it is still treated as 
so much merely theoretic knowledge amassed by special- 
ists, and at most communicated by them in books and 
articles to the general public. We are habituated to the 
idea that every discovery in physical knowledge signi- 
fies, sooner or later, a change in the processes of pio 
diiction; there are countless persons whose business 
it is to see that these discoveries take effect through 
invention in improved operations in practice. There is 
next to nothing of the same sort with respect to knowl- 
edge of man and human affairs. Although the latter is 
recognized to concern man in the sense of being about 
him, it is of less practical effect than are the much 
more remote findings of physical science. 

The inchoate state of social knowledge is reflected in 
the two fields where intelligence might be supposed to 
be most alert and most continuously active, education 
and the formation of social policies in legislation. 
Science is taught in our schools. But very largely it 
appears in schools simply as another study, to be ac- 
quired by much the same methods as are employed in 
“learning” the older studies that are part of the curric- 
ulum. If it were treated as what it is, the method of 
intelligence itself in action, then the method of science 
would be incarnate in every branch of study and every 
detail of learning. Thought would be connected with 
the possibility of action, and every mode of action 



SOCIAL ACTION 47 

would be reviewed to see its bearing upon the habits 
and ideas from which it sprang. Until science is treated 
educationally in this way, the introduction of what is 
called science into the schools signifies one more oppor- 
tunity for the mechanization of the material and methods 
of study. When “learning” is treated not as an expan- 
sion of the understanding and judgment of meanings 
hut as an acquisition of information, the method of 
cooperative experimental intelligence finds its way into 
the working structure of the individual only incidentally 
and by devious paths. 

Of the place and use of socially organized intelligence 
in the conduct of public affairs, through legislation and 
administration, I shall have something to say in the 
next chapter. At this point of the discussion I am con- 
tent to ask the reader to compare the force it now exerts 
in politics with that of the interest of individuals and 
parties in capturing and retaining office and power, with 
that exercised by the propaganda of publicity agents and 
that of organized pressure groups. 

Humanly speaking, the crisis in liberalism was a 
product of particular historical events. Soon after liberal 
tenets were formulated as eternal truths, it became an 
instrument of vested interests in opposition to further 
social change, a ritual of lip-service, or else was shat- 
tered by new forces that came in. Nevertheless, the idea^ 
of liberty, of individuality and of freed intelligence 
have an enduring value, a value never more needed 
than now. It is the business of liberalism to state these 
values in ways, intellectual and practical, that are rele- 



48 LIBERALISM AND 

vant to present needs and forces. If we employ the con- 
ception of historic relativity, nothing is clearer than 
that the conception of liberty is always relative to forces 
that at a given time and place are increasingly felt to 
; be oppressive. Liberty in the concrete signifies release 
from the impact of particular oppressive forces; eman- 
cipation from something once taken as a normal part o( 
j human life but now experienced as bondage. At one 
time, liberty signified liberation from chattel slavery; 
at another time, release of a class from serfdom. During 
the late seventeenth and early eighteenth centuries it 
meant liberation from despotic dynastic rule. A century 
later it meant release of industrialists from inherited 
legal customs that hampered the rise of new forces of 
production. Today, it signifies liberation from material 
insecurity and from the coercions and repressions that 
prevent multitudes from participation in the vast cul- 
tural resources that are at hand. The direct impact of 
liberty always has to do with some class or group that 
is suffering in a special way from some form of con- 
straint exercised by the distribution of powers that exists 
in contemporary society. Should a classless society ever 
come into being the formal concept of liberty would 
lose its significance, because the fact for which it stands 
would have become an integral part of the established 
relations of human beings to one another. 

Until such a time arrives liberalism will continue to 
have a necessary social office to perform. Its task is the 
mediation of social transitions. This phrase may seem 
to some to be a virtual admission that liberalism is a 



SOCIAL ACTION 49 

colorless “middle of the road” doctrine. Not so, even 
though liberalism has sometimes taken that form in 
practice. We are always dependent upon the experience 
(hat has accumulated in the past and yet there are 
always new forces coming in, new needs arising, that 
demand, if the new forces are to operate and the new 
needs to be satisfied, a reconstruction of the patterns 
of old experience. The old and the new have forever to 
be integrated with each other, so that the values of old 
experience may become the servants and instruments of 
new desires and aims. We are always possessed by habits 
and customs, and this fact signifies that we are always 
influenced by the inertia and the momentum of forces 
temporally outgrown but nevertheless still present with 
us as a part of our being. Human life gets set in pat- 
terns, institutional and moral. But change is also with 
us and demands the constant remaking cf old habits and 
old ways of thinking, desiring and acting. The effective 
ratio between the old and the stabilizing and the new 
and disturbing is very different at different times. Some- 
times whole communities seem to be dominated by cus- 
tom, and changes are produced only by irruptions and 
invasions JY jin outside. Sometimes, as at present, change 
is so varied and accelerated that customs seem to be dis- 
solving before our very eyes. But be the ratio little or 
great, there is always an adjustment to be made, and as 
soon as the need for it becomes conscious, liberalism 
has a function and a meaning. It is not that liberalism 
creates the need, but that the necessity for adjustment 
defines the office of liberalism. 



50 LIBERALISM AND 

For the only adjustment that does not have to In- 
made over again, and perhaps even under more un- 
favorable circumstances than when it was first attempted, 
is that effected through intelligence as a method. In ils 
large sense, this remaking of the old through union willi 
the new is precisely what intelligence is. It is conversion 
of past experience into knowledge and projection of 
that knowledge in ideas and purposes that anticipate whal 
may come to be in the future and that indicate how to 
realize what is desired. Every problem that arises, per- 
sonal or collective, simple or complex, is solved only by 
selecting material from the store of knowledge amassed 
in past experience and by bringing into play habits 
already formed. But the knowledge and the habits have to 
be modified to meet the new conditions that have arisen. 
In collective problems, the habits that are involved are 
traditions and institutions. The standing danger is either 
that they will be acted upon implicitly, without recon- 
struction to meet new conditions, or else that there will 
he an impatient and blind rush forward, directed only 
by some dogma rigidly adhered to. The office of intelli- 
gence in every problem that either a person or a com- 
munity meets is to effect a working connection between 
old habits, customs, institutions, beliefs, and new condi- 
tions. What I have called the mediating function of 
liberalism is all one with the work of intelligence. This 
fact is the root, whether it be consciously realized or not, 
of the emphasis placed by liberalism upon the role of 
freed intelligence as the method of directing social 
action. 



SOCIAL ACTION 



51 

Objections that are brought against liberalism ignore 
I lie fact that the only alternatives to dependence upon 
intelligence are either drift and casual improvisation, or 
I lie use of coercive force stimulated by unintelligent emo- 
tion and fanatical dogmatism — the latter being intoler- 
ant by its very constitution. The objection that the method 
of intelligence has been tried and failed is wholly aside 
from the point, since the crux of the present situation 
) is that it has not been tried under such conditions as 
now exist. It has not been tried at any time with use 
of all the resources that scientific material and the 
experimental method now put at our disposal. It is also 
said that intelligence is cold and that persons are moved 
lo new ways of acting only by emotion, just as habit 
makes them adhere to old ways. Of course, intelligence 
does not generate action except as it is enkindled by 
feeling. But the notion that there is some inherent 
opposition between emotion and intelligence is a relic 
of the notion of mind that grew up before the experi- 
mental method of science had emerged. For the latter 
method signifies the union of ideas with action, a union 
that is intimate; and action generates and supports emo- 
tion. Ideas that are framed to be put into operation 
for the sake of guiding action are imbued with all the 
emotional force that attaches to the ends proposed for 
action, and are accompanied with all the excitement and 
inspiration that attends the struggle to realize the ends. 
Since the ends of liberalism are liberty and the oppor- 
tunity of individuals to secure full realization of their 
potentialities, all of the emotional intensity that belongs 



LIBERALISM AND 



52 

to these ends gathers about the ideas and acts that arc 
necessary to make them real. 

Again, it is said that the average citizen is not en- 
dowed with the degree of intelligence that the use <>l 
it as a method demands. This objection, supported by 
alleged scientific findings about heredity and by impres- 
sive statistics concerning the intelligence quotients of 
the average citizen, rests wholly upon the old notion 
that intelligence is a ready-made possession of indi- 
viduals. The last stand of oligarchical and anti-social 
seclusion is perpetuation of this purely individualistic 
notion of intelligence. The reliance of liberalism is 
not upon the mere abstraction of a native endowment 
unaffected by social relationships, but upon the fact 
I that native capacity is sufficient to enable the average 
I individual to respond to and to use the knowledge and 
l the skill that are embodied in the social conditions in 
which he lives, moves and has his being. There are few 
individuals who have the native capacity that was re- 
quired to invent the stationary steam-engine, locomotive, 
dynamo or telephone. But there are none so mean that 
they cannot intelligently utilize these embodiments of 
intelligence once they are a part of the organized means 
of associated living. 

The indictments that are drawn against the intelli- 
gence of individuals are in truth indictments of a social 
order that does not permit the average individual to have 
access to the rich store of the accumulated wealth of 
^ mankind in knowledge, ideas and purposes. There does 
not now exist the kind of social organization that even 



it 



SOCIAL ACTION 53 

permits the average human being to share the poten- 
I mlly available social intelligence. Still less is there a 
social order that has for one of its chief purposes the * 
establishment of conditions that will move the mass of 
individuals to appropriate and use what is at hand. 
Hack of the appropriation by the few of the material 
resources of society lies the appropriation by the few 
in behalf of their own ends of the cultural, the spiritual, 
resources that are the product not of the individuals who 
have taken possession but of the cooperative work of 
humanity. It is useless to talk about the failure of 
democracy until the source of its failure has been 
grasped and steps are taken to bring about that type of 
social organization that will encourage the socialized 
extension of intelligence. 

The crisis in liberalism, as I said at the outset, pro- 
ceeds from the fact that after early liberalism had done 
its work, society faced a new problem, that of social 
organization. Its work was to liberate a group of indi- 
viduals, representing the new science and the new forces 
of productivity, from customs, ways of thinking, institu- 
tions, that were oppressive of the new modes of social 
action, however useful they may have been in their day. 

The instruments of analysis, of criticism, of dissolution, 
that were employed were effective for the work of 
release. But when it came to the problem of organizing 
the new forces and the individuals whose modes of life 
they radically altered into a coherent social organiza- 
tion, possessed of intellectual and moral directive power, 
liberalism was well-nigh impotent. The rise of national 



54 LIBERALISM AND 

polities that pretend to represent the order, discipline 
and spiritual authority that will counteract social dis- 
integration is a tragic comment upon the unpreparedness' 
of older liberalism to deal with the new problem which 
its very success precipitated. 

But the values of freed intelligence, of liberty, <>l 
opportunity for every individual to realize the poten- 
tialities of which he is possessed, are too precious to be 
sacrificed to a regime of despotism, especially when the 
regime is in such large measure merely the agent of a 
dominant economic class in its struggle to keep and 
extend the gains it has amassed at the expense of genuine 
social order, unity, and development. Liberalism has to 
gather itself together to formulate the ends to which it is 
devoted in terms of means that are relevant to the con- 
temporary situation. The only form of enduring social 
organization that is now possible is one in which the 
new forces of productivity are cooperatively controlled 
and used in the interest of the effective liberty and the 
cultural development of the individuals that constitute 
society. Such a social order cannot be established by 
an unplanned and external convergence of the actions 
of separate individuals, each of whom is bent on per- 
sonal private advantage. This idea is the Achilles heel 
of early liberalism. The idea that liberalism cannot 
maintain its ends and at the same time reverse its con- 
ception of the means by which they are to be attained 
is folly. The ends can now be achieved only by reversal 
of the means to which early liberalism was committed. 
Organized social planning, put into effect for the crea- 



SOCIAL ACTION 55 

lion of an order in which industry and finance are 
socially directed in behalf of institutions that provide 
I he material basis for the cultural liberation and growth 
<>( individuals, is now the sole method of social action 
by which liberalism can realize its professed aims. Such 
planning demands in turn a new conception and logic of 
freed intelligence as a social force. To these phases of a 
renascent liberalism, I turn in the chapter that follows. 



* III * 



renascent liberalism 

Nothing is blinder than the supposition that we live 
in a society and world so static that either nothing new 
will happen or else it will happen because of the use ol 
violence. Social change is here as a fact, a fact having 
multifarious forms and marked in intensity. Changes 
that are revolutionary in effect are in process in every 
phase of life. Transformations in the family, the church, 
the school, in science and art, in economic and political 
relations, are occurring so swiftly that imagination is 
'baffled in attempt to lay hold of them. Flux does not 
have to be created. But it does have to be directed. It 
has to be so controlled that it will move to some end m 
accordance with the principles of life, since life itself is 
development. Liberalism is committed to an end that is 
l at once enduring and flexible: the liberation of indi- 
viduals so that realization of their capacities may e 
' the law of their life. It is committed to the use of freed 
intelligence as the method of directing change. In any 
case, civilization is faced with the problem of muting 
the changes that are going on into a coherent pattern o 

social organization. The liberal spirit is marked by its 

56 




SOCIAL ACTION 57 

own picture of the pattern that is required: a social 
organization that will make possible effective liberty 
and opportunity for personal growth in mind and spirit 
in all individuals. Its present need is recognition that 
established material security is a prerequisite of the 
ends which it cherishes, so that, the basis of life being 
secure, individuals may actively share in the wealth of 
cultural resources that now exist and may contribute, 
each in his own way, to their further enrichment. 

The fact of change has been so continual and so 
intense that it overwhelms our minds. We are bewildered 
by the spectacle of its rapidity, scope and intensity. 
It is not surprising that men have protected themselves 
from the impact of such vast change by resorting to 
what psycho-analysis has taught us to call rationaliza- 
tions, in other words, protective fantasies. The Victorian 
idea that change is a part of an evolution that neces- 
sarily leads through successive stages to some preor- 
dained divine far-off event is one rationalization. The 
conception of a sudden, complete, almost catastrophic, 
transformation, to be brought about by the victory of 
the proletariat over the class now dominant, is a similar 
rationalization. But men have met the impact of change 
in the realm of actuality, mostly by drift and by tem- 
porary, usually incoherent, improvisations. Liberalism, 
like every other theory of life, has suffered from the 
state of confused uncertainty that is the lot of a world 
suffering from rapid and varied change for which there 
is no intellectual and moral preparation. 

Because of this lack of mental and moral prepara- 



58 LIBERALISM AND 

tion the impact of swiftly moving changes produced, as I 
have just said, confusion, uncertainty and drift. Chang * 1 
in patterns of belief, desire and purpose has lagged 
behind the modification of the external conditions under 
which men associate. Industrial habits have changed 
most rapidly; there has followed at considerable dis- 
tance, change in political relations; alterations in leg;il 
relations and methods have lagged even more, while 
changes in the institutions that deal most directly willi 
patterns of thought and belief have taken place to 
the least extent. This fact defines the primary, though 
not by any means the ultimate, responsibility of a 
liberalism that intends to be a vital force. Its work is 
first of all education, in the broadest sense of that term. 
Schooling is a part of the work of education, but educa- 
tion in its full meaning includes all the influences that 
go to form the attitudes and dispositions (of desire as 
well as of belief), which constitute dominant habits of 
mind and character. 

Let me mention three changes that have taken place 
in one of the institutions in which immense shifts have 
occurred, but that are still relatively external — external 
in the sense that the pattern of intelligent purpose and 
emotion has not been correspondingly modified. Civiliza- 
tion existed for most of human history in a state of 
scarcity in the material basis for a humane life. Our 
ways of thinking, planning and working have been 
attuned to this fact. Thanks to science and technology 
we now live in an age of potential plenty. The imme- 
diate effect of the emergence of the new possibility was 



SOCIAL ACTION 59 

simply to stimulate, to a point of incredible exaggera- 
tion, the striving for the material resources, called 
wealth, opened to men in the new vista. It is a charac- 
teristic of all development, physiological and mental, 
that when a new force and factor appears, it is first 
pushed to an extreme. Only when its possibilities have 
been exhausted (at least relatively) does it take its 
place in the life perspective. The economic-material 
phase of life, which belongs in the basal ganglia of 
society, has usurped for more than a century the cortex 
of the social body. The habits of desire and effort that 
were bred in the age of scarcity do not readily subor- 
dinate themselves and take the place of the matter-of- 
course routine that becomes appropriate to them when 
machines and impersonal power have the capacity to 
liberate man from bondage to the strivings that were 
once needed to make secure his physical basis. Even 
now when there is a vision of an age of abundance and 
when the vision is supported by hard fact, it is material 
security as an end that appeals to most rather than the 
way of living which this security makes possible. Men’s 
minds are still pathetically held in the clutch of old 
habits and haunted by old memories. 

For, in the second place, insecurity is the natural - 1 
child and the foster child, too, of scarcity., Early liber- 
alism emphasized the importance of insecurity as a 
fundamentally necessary economic motive, holding that 
without this goad men would not work, abstain or 
accumulate. Formulation of this conception was new. 
But the fact that was formulated was nothing new. It 



LIBERALISM AND 



60 

was deeply rooted in the habits that were formed in I In- 
long struggle against material scarcity. The system llial 
goes by the name of capitalism is a systematic mani- 
festation of desires and purposes built up in an age of 
ever threatening want and now carried over into a time 
of ever increasing potential plenty. The conditions ilia! 
generate insecurity for the many no longer spring from 
nature. They are found in institutions and arrangement 
that are within deliberate human control. Surely this 
change marks one of the greatest revolutions that lias 
taken place in all human history. Because of it, in- 
security is not now the motive to work and sacrifice buL 
to despair. It is not an instigation to put forth energy 
but to an impotency that can be converted from deatli 
into endurance only by charity. But the habits of mind 
and action that modify institutions to make potential 
abundance an actuality are still so inchoate that most 
of us discuss labels like individualism, socialism and 
* communism instead of even perceiving the possibility, 
much less the necessity for realizing what can and 
should be. 

In the third place, the patterns of belief and purpose 
that still dominate economic institutions were formed 
when individuals produced with their hands, alone or 
in small groups. The notion that society in general is 
served by the unplanned coincidence of the consequences 
of a vast multitude of efforts put forth by isolated indi- 
viduals without reference to any social end, was also 
something new as a formulation. But it also formulated 
the working principle of an epoch which the advent of 



SOCIAL ACTION 61 

new forces of production was to bring to an end. It 
demands no great power of intelligence to see that under 
present conditions the isolated individual is well-nigh 
helpless. Concentration and corporate organization are 
the rule. But the concentration and corporate organiza- 
tion are still controlled in their operation by ideas 
that were institutionalized in eons of separate individual 
effort. The attempts at cooperation for mutual benefit 
that are put forth are precious as experimental moves. 
But that society itself should see to it that a cooperative 
industrial order be instituted, one that is consonant with 
the realities of production enforced by an era of ma- 
chinery and power, is so novel an idea to the general 
mind that its mere suggestion is hailed with abusive 
epithets — sometimes with imprisonment. 

When, then, I say that the first object of a renascent 
liberalism is education, I mean that its task is to aid in 
producing the habits of mind and character, the intellec- 
tual and moral patterns, that are somewhere near even 
with the actual movements of events. It is, I repeat, 
the split between the latter as they have externally 
occurred and the ways of desiring, thinking, and of 
putting emotion and purpose into execution that is the 
basic cause of present confusion in mind and paralysis 
in action. The educational task cannot be accomplished 
merely by working upon men’s minds, without action 
that effects actual change in institutions. The idea that 
dispositions and attitudes can be altered by merely 
“moral” means conceived of as something that goes on 
wholly inside of persons is itself one of the old patterns 



62 liberalism and 

that has to be changed. Thought, desire and purpose 
exist in a constant give and take of interaction with 
environing conditions. But resolute thought is the first 
step in that change of action that will itself carry 
further the needed change in patterns of mind and 
character. 

In short, liberalism must now become radical, mean- 
ing by bl radical” perception of the necessity of thorough- 
going changes in the set-up of institutions and corre- 
sponding activity to bring the changes to pass. For die 
gulf between what the actual situation makes possible 
and the actual state itself is so great that it cannot be 
bridged by piecemeal policies undertaken ad hoc . The 
process of producing the changes will be, in any case, a 
gradual one. But reforms 59 that deal now with this 
abuse and now with that without having a social goal 
based upon an inclusive plan, differ entirely from effort 
at re-forming, in its literal sense, the institutional 
scheme of things. The liberals of more than a century 
ago were denounced in their time as subversive radicals, 
and only when the new economic order was established 
did they become apologists for the status quo or else 
content with social patchwork. If radicalism be defined 
as perception of need for radical change, then today any 
liberalism which is not also radicalism is irrelevant and 
doomed. 

But radicalism also means, in the minds of many, 
bo tli supporters and opponents, dependence upon use 
of violence as die main method of effecting drastic 
changes. 1 1 ere the liberal parts company. For he is com- 



SOCIAL ACTION 63 

mitted to the organization of intelligent action as the 
chief method. Any frank discussion of the issue must 
recognize the extent to which those who decry the use 
of any violence are themselves willing to resort to 
violence and are ready to put their will into operation. 
Their fundamental objection is to change in the eco- 
nomic institution that now exists, and for its main- 
tenance they resort to the use of the force that is placed 
in their hands by this very institution. They do not need 
to advocate the use of force; their only need is to em- 
ploy it. Force, rather than intelligence, is built into the 
procedures of the existing social system, regularly as 
coercion, in times of crisis as overt violence. The legal 
system, conspicuously in its penal aspect, more subtly 
in civil practice, rests upon coercion. Wars are the 
methods recurrently used in settlement of disputes be- 
tween nations. One school of radicals dwells upon the 
fact that in the past the transfer of power in one society 
has either been accomplished by or attended with vio- 
lence. But what we need to realize is that physical force 
is used, at least in the form of coercion, in the very set-up 
of our society. That the competitive system, which was 
thought of by early liberals as the means by which the 
latent abilities of individuals were to be evoked and 
directed into socially useful channels, is now in fact a 
state of scarcely disguised battle hardly needs to be 
dwelt upon. That the control of the means of produc- 
tion by the few in legal possession operates as a stand- 
ing agency of coercion of the many, may need emphasis 
in statement, but is surely evident to one who is willing 



64 LIBERALISM AND 

to observe and honestly report the existing scene. It is 
foolish to regard the political state as the only agency 
now endowed with coercive power. Its exercise of this 
power is pale in contrast with that exercised by concen- 
trated and organized property interests. 

It is not surprising in view of our standing depend- 
ence upon the use of coercive force that at every time 
of crisis coercion breaks out into open violence. In this 
country, with its tradition of violence fostered by fron- 
tier conditions and by the conditions under which im- 
migration went on during the greater part of our 
history, resort to violence is especially recurrent on the 
part of those who are in power. In times of imminent 
change, our verbal and sentimental worship of the Con- 
stitution, with its guarantees of civil liberties of ex- 
pression, publication and assemblage, readily goes 
overboard. Often the officials of the law are the worst 
offenders, acting as agents of some power that rules the 
economic life of a community. What is said about the 
value of free speech as a safety valve is then forgotten 
with the utmost of ease: a comment, perhaps, upon the 
weakness of the defense of freedom of expression that 
values it simply as a means of blowing-off steam. 

It is not pleasant to face the extent to which, as mat- 
ter of fact, coercive and violent force is relied upon in 
the present social system as a means of social control. 
It is much more agreeable to evade the fact. But unless 
the fact is acknowledged as a fact in its full depth and 
breadth, the meaning of dependence upon intelligence 
as the alternative method of social direction will not be 



SOCIAL ACTION 65 

grasped. Failure in acknowledgment signifies, among 
other things, failure to realize that those who propa- 
gate the dogma of dependence upon force have the 
sanction of much that is already entrenched in the ex- 
isting system. They would hut turn the use of it to 
opposite ends. The assumption that the method of intel- 
ligence already rules and that those who urge the use 
of violence are introducing a new element into the social 
picture may not he hypocritical but it is unintelligently 
unaware of what is actually involved in intelligence as 
an alternative method of social action. 

I begin with an example of what is really involved in 
the issue. Why is it, apart from our tradition of violence, 
that liberty of expression is tolerated and even lauded 
when social affairs seem to be going in a quiet fashion, 
and yet is so readily destroyed whenever matters grow 
critical? The general answer, of course, is that at bot- 
tom social institutions have habituated us to the use of 
force in some veiled form. But a part of the answer is 
found in our ingrained habit of regarding intelligence 
as an individual possession and its exercise as an indi- 
vidual right. It is false that freedom of inquiry and of 
expression are not modes of action. They are exceed- 
ingly potent modes of action. The reactionary grasps 
this fact, in practice if not in express idea, more quickly 
than the liberal, who is too much given to holding that 
this freedom is innocent of consequences, as well as 
being a merely individual right. The result is that this 
liberty is tolerated as long as it does not seem to menace 
in any way the status quo of society. When it does. 



66 LIBERALISM AND 

every effort is put forth to identify the established order 
with the public good. When this identification is estab- 
lished, it follows that any merely individual right musl 
i yield to the general welfare. As long as freedom of 
thought and speech is claimed as a merely individual 
right, it will give way, as do other merely personal 
claims, when it is, or is successfully represented to be, 
in opposition to the general welfare. 

I would not in the least disparage the noble fight 
waged by early liberals in behalf of individual freedom 
of thought and expression. We owe more to them than 
it is possible to record in words. No more eloquent 
words have ever come from any one than those of Jus- 
tice Brandeis in the case of a legislative act that in fact 
restrained freedom of political expression. He said : 
“Those who won our independence believed that the 
final end of the State was to make men free to develop 
their faculties, and that in its government the delibera- 
tive faculties should prevail over the arbitrary. They 
valued liberty both as an end and as a means. They 
believed liberty to be the secret of happiness and cour- 
age to be the secret of liberty. They believed that free- 
dom to think as you will and to speak as you think are 
means indispensable to the discovery and spread of 
political truth; that without free speech and assembly 
discussion would be futile; that with them, discussion 
affords ordinarily adequate protection against the dis- 
semination of noxious doctrines; that the greatest men- 
ace to freedom is an inert people; that public discussion 
is a political duty; and that this should be a funda- 






SOCIAL ACTION 67 

mental principle of the American government.” This is 
the creed of a fighting liberalism. But the issue I am 
raising is connected with the fact that these words are 
found in a dissenting, a minority opinion of the Supreme 
Court of the United States. The public function of free 
individual thought and speech is clearly recognized in 
the words quoted. But the reception of the truth of the 
words is met by an obstacle: the old habit of defending 
liberty of thought and expression as something inhering 
in individuals apart from and even in opposition to 
social claims. 

Liberalism has to assume the responsibility for mak- 
ing it clear that intelligence is a social asset and is 
clothed with a function as public as is its origin, in the 
concrete, in social cooperation. It was Comte who, in 
reaction against the purely individualistic ideas that 
seemed to him to underlie the French Revolution, said 
that in mathematics, physics and astronomy there is no 
right of private conscience. If we remove the statement 
from the context of actual scientific procedure, it is 
dangerous because it is false. The individual inquirer 
has not only the right but the duty to criticize the ideas, 
theories and “laws” that are current in science. But if 
we take the statement in the context of scientific method, 
it indicates that he carries on this criticism in virtue of 
a socially generated body of knowledge and by means 
of methods that are not of private origin and possession. 
He uses a method that retains public validity even when 
innovations are introduced in its use and application. 

Henry George, speaking of ships that ply the ocean 



# 



63 LIBERALISM AND 

with a velocity of five or six hundred miles a day, re- 
marked, “There is nothing whatever to show that the 
men who today build and navigate and use such ships 
are one whit superior in any physical or mental quality 
to their ancestors, whose best vessel was a coracle of 
wicker and hide. The enormous improvement which these; 
ships show is not an improvement of human nature; it 
is an improvement of society — it is due to a wider and 
fuller union of individual efforts in accomplishment of 
common ends.” This single instance, duly pondered, 
gives a better idea of the nature of intelligence and its 
social office than would a volume of abstract disserta- 
tion. Consider merely two of the factors that enter in 
and their social consequences. Consider what is involved 
in the production of steel, from the first use of fire and 
then the crude smelting of ore, to the processes that now 
effect the mass production of steel. Consider also the 
development of the power of guiding ships across track- 
less wastes from the day when they hugged the shore, 
steering by visible sun and stars, to the appliances that 
now enable a sure course to be taken. It would require 
a heavy tome to describe the advances in science, in 
mathematics, astronomy, physics, chemistry, that have 
made these two things possible. The record would be an 
account of a vast multitude of cooperative efforts, in 
which one individual uses the results provided for him 
by a countless number of other individuals, and uses 
them so as to add to the common and public store. A 
survey of such facts brings home the actual social char- 
acter of intelligence as it actually develops and majies 



SOCIAL ACTION 69 

its way. Survey of the consequences upon the ways of 
living of individuals and upon the terms on which men 
associate together, due to the new method of transporta- 
tion would take us to the wheat farmer of the prairies, 
the cattle raiser of the plains, the cotton grower of the 
South; into a multitude of mills and factories, and to the 
counting-room of banks, and what would be seen in this 
country would be repeated in every country of the 
globe. 

It is to such things as these, rather than to abstract 
and formal psychology that we must go if we would 
learn the nature of intelligence: in itself, in its ori- 
gin and development, and its uses and consequences. 
At this point, I should like to recur to an idea put for- 
ward in the preceding chapter. I then referred to the 
contempt often expressed for reliance upon intelligence 
as a social method, and I said this scorn is due to the 
identification of intelligence with native endowments of 
individuals. In contrast to this notion, I spoke of the 
power of individuals to appropriate and respond to the 
intelligence, the knowledge, ideas and purposes that 
have been integrated in the medium in which individuals 
live. Each of us knows, for example, some mechanic of 
ordinary native capacity who is intelligent within the 
matters of his calling. He has lived in an environment 
in which the cumulative intelligence of a multitude of 
cooperating individuals is embodied, and by the use of 
his native capacities he makes some phase of this 
intelligence his own. Given a social medium in whose 
institutions the available knowledge, ideas and art of 



70 LIBERALISM AND 

humanity were incarnate, and the average individual 
would rise to undreamed heights of social and political 
intelligence. 

The rub, the problem is found in the proviso. Can the 
intelligence actually existent and potentially available 
be embodied in that institutional medium in which an 
individual thinks, desires and acts? Before dealing di- 
rectly with this question, I wish to say something abouL 
the operation of intelligence in our present politica I 
institutions, as exemplified by current practices of demo- 
cratic government. I would not minimize the advance 
scored in substitution of methods of discussion and 
conference for the method of arbitrary rule. But the 
better is too often the enemy of the still better. Discus- 
sion, as the manifestation of intelligence in political 
life, stimulates publicity; by its means sore spots are 
brought to light that would otherwise remain hidden. 
It affords opportunity for promulgation of new ideas. 
Compared with despotic rule, it is an invitation to indi- 
viduals to concern themselves with public affairs. But 
discussion and dialectic, however indispensable they are 
to the elaboration of ideas and policies after ideas 
are once put forth, are weak reeds to depend upon for 
systematic origination of comprehensive plans, the plans 
that are required if the problem of social organization 
is to be met. There was a time when discussion, the 
comparison of ideas already current so as to purify and 
clarify them, was thought to be sufficient in discovery 
of the structure and laws of physical nature. In the lat- 
ter field, the method was displaced by that of experi- 



SOCIAL ACTION 71 

mental observation guided by comprehensive working 
hypotheses, and using all the resources made available 
by mathematics. 

But we still depend upon the method of discussion, 
with only incidental scientific control, in politics. Our 
system of popular suffrage, immensely valuable as it is 
in comparison with what preceded it, exhibits the idea 
that intelligence is an individualistic possession, at best 
enlarged by public discussion. Existing political practice, 
with its complete ignoring of occupational groups and 
the organized knowledge and purposes that are involved 
in the existence of such groups, manifests a dependence 
upon a summation of individuals quantitatively, similar 
to Bentham’s purely quantitative formula of the greatest 
sum of pleasures of the greatest possible number. The 
formation of parties or, as the eighteenth-century writers 
called them, factions, and the system of party govern- 
ment is the practically necessary counterweight to a nu- 
merical and atomistic individualism. The idea that the 
conflict of parties will, by means of public discussion, 
bring out necessary public truths is a kind of political 
watered-down version of the Hegelian dialectic, with 
its synthesis arrived at by a union of antithetical con- 
ceptions. The method has nothing in common with the 
procedure of organized cooperative inquiry which has 
won the triumphs of science in the field of physical 
nature. 

Intelligence in politics when it is identified with dis- 
cussion means reliance upon symbols. The invention of 
language is probably the greatest single invention 



72 LIBERALISM AND 

achieved by humanity. The development of political 
forms that promote the use of symbols in place of arbi- 
trary power was another great invention. The nineteenth- 
century establishment of parliamentary institutions, 
written constitutions and the suffrage as means of politi- 
cal rule, is a tribute to the power of symbols. But sym- 
bols are significant only in connection with realities 
behind them. No intelligent observer can deny, I think, 
that they are often used in party politics as a substitute 
for realities instead of as means of contact with them. 
Popular literacy, in connection with the telegraph, cheap 
postage and the printing press, has enormously multi- 
plied the number of those influenced. That which we 
term education has done a good deal to generate habits 
that put symbols in the place of realities. The forms of 
popular government make necessary the elaborate use 
of words to influence political action. “Propaganda” is 
the inevitable consequence of the combination of these 
influences and it extends to every area of life. Words 
not only take the place of realities but are themselves 
debauched. Decline in the prestige of suffrage and of 
parliamentary government are intimately associated 
with the belief, manifest in practice even if not ex- 
pressed in words, that intelligence is an individual pos- 
session to be reached by means of verbal persuasion. 

This fact suggests, by way of contrast, the genuine 
meaning of intelligence in connection with public opin- 
ion, sentiment and action. The crisis in democracy de- 
mands the substitution of the intelligence that is 
exemplified in scientific procedure for the kind of intel- 



SOCIAL ACTION 73 

ligence that is now accepted. The need for this change 
is not exhausted in the demand for greater honesty and 
impartiality, even though these qualities be now cor- 
rupted by discussion carried on mainly for purposes of 
party supremacy and for imposition of some special but 
concealed interest. These qualities need to be restored. 
But the need goes further. The social use of intelligence 
would remain deficient even if these moral traits were 
exalted, and yet intelligence continued to be identified 
simply with discussion and persuasion, necessary as are 
these things/ Approximation to use of scientific method 
in investigation and of the engineering mind in the 
invention and projection of far-reaching social plans is 
demanded. The habit of considering social realities in 
terms of cause and effect and social policies in terms of 
means and consequences is still inchoate. The contrast 
between the state of intelligence in politics and in the 
physical control of nature is to be taken literally. What 
has happened in this latter is the outstanding demon- 
stration of the meaning of organized intelligence. The 
combined effect of science and technology has released 
more productive energies in a bare hundred years than 
stands to the credit of prior human history in its en- 
tirety. Productively it has multiplied nine million times 
in the last generation alone. The prophetic vision of 
Francis Bacon of subjugation of the energies of nature 
through change in methods of inquiry has well-nigh been 
realized. The stationary engine, the locomotive, the dy- 
namo, the motor car, turbine, telegraph, telephone, radio 
and moving picture are not the products of either iso- 



74 LIBERALISM AND 

lated individual minds nor of the particular economic 
regime called capitalism. They are the fruit of methods 
that first penetrated to the working causalities of nature 
and then utilized the resulting knowledge in bold imagi- 
native ventures of invention and construction. 

We hear a great deal in these days about class con- 
flict. The past history of man is held up to us as almost 
exclusively a record of struggles between classes, ending 
in the victory of a class that had been oppressed and 
the transfer of power to it. It is difficult to avoid reading 
the past in terms of the contemporary scene. Indeed, 
fundamentally it is impossible to avoid this course. With 
a certain proviso, it is highly important that we are 
compelled to follow this path. For the past as past is 
gone, save for esthetic enjoyment and refreshment, while 
the present is with us. Knowledge of the past is sig- 
nificant only as it deepens and extends our understand- 
ing of the present. Yet there is a proviso. We must grasp 
the things that are most important in the present when 
we turn to the past and not allow ourselves to be misled 
by secondary phenomena no matter how intense and 
immediately urgent they are. Viewed from this stand- 
point, the rise of scientific method and of technology 
based upon it is the genuinely active force in producing 
the vast complex of changes the world is now under- 
going, not the class struggle whose spirit and method 
are opposed to science. If we lay hold upon the causal 
force exercised by this embodiment of intelligence we 
shall know where to turn for the means of directing 
further change. 



SOCIAL ACTION 75 

When I say that scientific method and technology 
have been the active force in producing the revolutionary 
transformations society is undergoing, I do not imply 
no other forces have been at work to arrest, deflect and 
corrupt their operation. Rather this fact is positively im- 
plied. At this point, indeed, is located the conflict that 
underlies the confusions and uncertainties of the pres- 
ent scene. The conflict is between institutions and habits 
originating in the pre-scientific and pre-technological 
age and the new forces generated by science and tech- 
nology. The application of science, to a considerable 
degree, even its own growth, has been conditioned by 
the system to which the name of capitalism is given, a 
rough designation of a complex of political and legal 
arrangements centering about a particular mode of eco- 
nomic relations. Because of the conditioning of science 
and technology by this setting, the second and humanly 
most important part of Bacon’s prediction has so far 
largely missed realization. The conquest of natural ener- 
gies has not accrued to the betterment of the common 
human estate in anything like the degree he anticipated. 

Because of conditions that were set by the legal insti- 
tutions and the moral ideas existing when the scientific 
and industrial revolutions came into being, the chief 
usufruct of the latter has been appropriated by a rela- 
tively small class. Industrial entrepreneurs have reaped 
out of all proportion to what they sowed. By obtaining 
private ownership of the means of production and ex- 
change they deflected a considerable share of the 
results of increased productivity to their private pockets. 



LIBERALISM AND 



76 

This appropriation was not the fruit of criminal con- 
spiracy or of sinister intent. It was sanctioned not only 
by legal institutions of age-long standing but by the 
entire prevailing moral code. The institution of private 
property long antedated feudal times. It is the institu- 
tion with which men have lived, with few exceptions, 
since the dawn of civilization. Its existence has deeply 
impressed itself upon mankind’s moral conceptions. 
Moreover, the new industrial forces tended to break 
down many of the rigid class barriers that had been in 
force, and to give to millions a new outlook and inspire 
a new hope; — especially in this country with no feudal 
background and no fixed class system. 

Since the legal institutions and the patterns of mind 
characteristic of ages of civilization still endure, there 
exists the conflict that brings confusion into every phase 
of present life. The problem of bringing into being a 
new social orientation and organization is, when reduced 
to its ultimates, the problem of using the new resources 
of production, made possible by the advance of physical 
science, for social ends, for what Bentham called the great- 
est good of the greatest number. Institutional relation- 
ships fixed in the pre-scientific age stand in the way of 
accomplishing this great transformation. Lag in mental 
and moral patterns provides the bulwark of the older 
institutions; in expressing the past they still express 
present beliefs, outlooks and purposes. Here is the place 
where the problem of liberalism centers today. 

The argument drawn from past history that radical 
change must be effected by means of class struggle, cul- 



SOCIAL ACTION 77 

minating in open war, fails to discriminate between the 
two forces, one active, the other resistant and deflecting, 
that have produced the social scene in which we live. 
The active force is, as I have said, scientific method and 
technological application. The opposite force is that of * 
older institutions and the habits that have grown up 
around them. Instead of discrimination between forces 
and distribution of their consequences, we find the two 
things lumped together. The compound is labeled the 
capitalistic or the bourgeois class, and to this class as a 
class is imputed all the important features of present 
industrialized society — much as the defenders of the 
regime of economic liberty exercised for private prop- 
erty are accustomed to attribute every improvement made 
in the last century and a half to the same capitalistic 
regime. Thus in orthodox communist literature, from 
the Communist Manifesto of 1848 to the present day, 
we are told that the bourgeoisie, the name for a dis- 
tinctive class, has done this and that. It has, so it is said, 
given a cosmopolitan character to production and con- 
sumption; has destroyed the national basis of industry; 
has agglomerated population in urban centers ; has trans- 
ferred power from the country to the city, in the process 
of creating colossal productive force, its chief achieve- 
ment. In addition, it has created crises of ever renewed 
intensity; has created imperialism of a new type in 
frantic effort to control raw materials and markets. 
Finally, it has created a new class, the proletariat, and 
has created it as a class having a common interest op- 
posed to that of the bourgeoisie, and is giving an irre- 



78 LIBERALISM AND 

sistible stimulus to its organization, first as a class and 
then as a political power. According to the economic 
version of the Hegelian dialectic, the bourgeois class is 
thus creating its own complete and polar opposite, and 
this in time will end the old power and rule. The class 
struggle of veiled civil war will finally burst into open 
revolution and the result will be either the common ruin 
of the contending parties or a revolutionary reconstitu- 
tion of society at large through a transfer of power 
from one class to another. 

The position thus sketched unites vast sweep with 
great simplicity. I am concerned with it here only as far 
as it emphasizes the idea of a struggle between classes, 
culminating in open and violent warfare as being the 
method for production of radical social change. For, be 
it noted, the issue is not whether some amount of violence 
will accompany the effectuation of radical change of 
institutions. The question is whether force or intelligence 
is to be the method upon which we consistently rely and 
to whose promotion we devote our energies. Insistence 
that the use of violent force is inevitable limits the use 
of available intelligence, for wherever the inevitable 
reigns intelligence cannot be used. Commitment to inevi- 
tability is always the fruit of dogma; intelligence does 
not pretend to know save as a result of experimentation, 
the opposite of preconceived dogma. Moreover, accept- 
ance in advance of the inevitability of violence tends to 
produce the use of violence in cases where peaceful 
methods might otherwise avail. The curious fact is that 
while it is generally admitted that this and that particu- 



SOCIAL ACTION 79 

lar social problem, say of the family, or railroads or 
banking, must be solved, if at all, by the method of 
intelligence, yet there is supposed to be some one all- 
inclusive social problem which can be solved only by the 
use of violence. This fact would be inexplicable were it 
not a conclusion from dogma as its premise. 

It is frequently asserted that the method of experi- 
mental intelligence can be applied to physical facts be- 
cause physical nature does not present conflicts of class 
interests, while it is inapplicable to society because the 
latter is so deeply marked by incompatible interests. 
It is then assumed that the “experimentalist” is one who 
has chosen to ignore the uncomfortable fact of conflicting 
interests. Of course, there are conflicting interests; other- 
wise there would be no social problems. The problem 
under discussion is precisely how conflicting claims 
are to be settled in the interest of the widest pos- 
sible contribution to the interests of all — or at least of 
the great majority. The method of democracy — inas- 
far as it is that of organized intelligence — is to bring 
these conflicts out into the open where their special claims 
can be seen and appraised, where they can be discxissed 
and judged in the light of more inclusive interests than 
are represented by either of them separately. There is, 
for example, a clash of interests between munition manu- 
facturers and most of the rest of the population. The more 
the respective claims of the two are publicly and scien- 
tifically weighed, the more likely it is that the public in- 
terest will be disclosed and be made effective. There is an 
undoubted objective clash of interests between finance- 



LIBERALISM AND 



80 

capitalism that controls the means of production and 
whose profit is served by maintaining relative scarcity, 
and idle workers and hungry consumers. But what gen- 
erates violent strife is failure to bring the conflict into 
the light of intelligence where the conflicting interests 
can be adjudicated in behalf of the interest of the great 
majority. Those most committed to the dogma of inevi- 
table force recognize the need for intelligently discover- 
ing and expressing the dominant social interest up to a 
certain point and then draw back. The “experimentalist” 
is one who would see to it that the method depended 
upon by all in some degree in every democratic com- 
munity be followed through to completion. 

In spite of the existence of class conflicts, amounting 
at times to veiled civil war, any one habituated to the 
use of the method of science will view with considerable 
suspicion the erection of actual human beings into fixed 
entities called classes, having no overlapping interests 
and so internally unified and externally separated that 
they are made the protagonists of history — itself hypo- 
thetical. Such an idea of classes is a survival of a rigid 
logic that once prevailed in the sciences of nature, but 
that no longer has any place there. This conversion of 
abstractions into entities smells more of a dialectic of 
concepts than of a realistic examination of facts, even 
though it makes more of an emotional appeal to many 
than do the results of the latter. To say that all past 
historic social progress has been the result of coopera- 
tion and not of conflict would be also an exaggeration. 
But exaggeration against exaggeration, it is the more 



SOCIAL ACTION 81 

reasonable of the two. And it is no exaggeration to say 
that the measure of civilization is the degree in which the 
method of cooperative intelligence replaces the method 
of brute conflict. 

But the point I am especially concerned with just 
here is the indiscriminate lumping together as a single 
force of two different things — the results of scientific 
technology and of a legal system of property relations. 
It is science and technology that have had the revolu- 
tionary social effect while the legal system has been the 
relatively static element. According to the Marxians 
themselves, the economic foundations of society consist 
of two things, the forces of production on one side and, 
on the other side, the social relations of production, that 
is, the legal property system under which the former 
operates. The latter lags behind, and “revolutions” are 
produced by the power of the forces of production to 
change the system of institutional relations. But what 
are the modern forces of production save those of sci- 
entific technology? And what is scientific technology 
save a large-scale demonstration of organized intelli- 
gence in action? 

It is quite true that what is happening socially is the 
result of the combination of the two factors, one dy- 
namic, the other relatively static. If we choose to call 
the combination by the name of capitalism, then it is 
true, or a truism, that capitalism is the “cause” of all 
the important social changes that have occurred an 
argument that the representatives of capitalism are eager 
to put forward whenever the increase of productivity is 



82 LIBERALISM AND 

in question. But if we want to understand , and not jusL 
to paste labels, unfavorable or favorable as the case may 
be, we shall certainly begin and end with discrimina- 
tion. Colossal increase in productivity, the bringing of 
men together in cities and large factories, the elimina- 
tion of distance, the accumulation of capital, fixed and 
liquid — these things would have come about, at a cer- 
tain stage, no matter what the established institutional 
system. They are the consequence of the new means of 
, technological production. Certain other things have hap- 
pened because of inherited institutions and the habits 
of belief and character that accompany and suppoil 
them. If we begin at this point, we shall see that the 
release of productivity is the product of cooperatively 
organized intelligence, and shall also see that the institu- 
tional framework is precisely that which is not subjected 
as yet, in any considerable measure, to the impact of 
inventive and constructive intelligence. That coercion 
and oppression on a large scale exist, no honest person 
can deny. But these things are not the product of science 
, and technology but of the perpetuation of old institu- 
tions and patterns untouched by scientific method. The 
inference to be drawn is clear. 

The argument, drawn from history, that great social 
changes have been effected only by violent means, needs 
considerable qualification, in view of the vast scope of 
changes that are taking place without the use of violence. 
But even if it be admitted to hold of the past, the con- 
clusion that violence is the method now to be depended 
upon does net follow — unless one is committed to a 



SOCIAL ACTION 83 

dogmatic philosophy of history. The radical who insists 
that the future method of change must be like that of the 
past has much in common with the hide-bound reac- 
tionary who holds to the past as an ultimate fact. Both 
overlook the fact that history in being a process of 
change generates change not only in details but also in 
the method of directing social change . I recur to what I 
said at the beginning of this chapter. It is true that the 
social order is largely conditioned by the use of coercive 
force, bursting at times into open violence. But what is 
also true is that mankind now has in its possession a 
new method, that of cooperative and experimental sci- 
ence which expresses the method of intelligence. I should 
be meeting dogmatism with dogmatism if I asserted that 
the existence of this historically new factor completely 
invalidates all arguments drawn from the effect of force 
in the past. But it is within the bounds of reason to as- 
sert that the presence of this social factor demands that 
the present situation be analyzed on its own terms, and 
not be rigidly subsumed under fixed conceptions drawn 
from the past. 

Any analysis made in terms of the present situation 
will not fail to note one fact that militates powerfully 
against arguments drawn from past use of violence. 
Modern warfare is destructive beyond anything known 
in older times. This increased destructiveness is due 
primarily, of course, to the fact that science has raised 
to a new pitch of destructive power all the agencies of 
armed hostility. But it is also due to the much greater 
interdependence of all the elements of society. The 




84 LIBERALISM AND 

bonds that hold modern communities and states together 
are as delicate as they are numerous. The self-sufficiency 
and independence of a local community, characteristic 
of more primitive societies, have disappeared in every 
highly industrialized country. The gulf that once sepa- 
rated the civilian population from the military has vir- 
tually gone. War involves paralysis of all normal social 
activities, and not merely the meeting of armed forces 
in the field. The Communist Manifesto presented two 
alternatives: either the revolutionary change and trans- 
fer of power to the proletariat, or the common ruin of the 
contending parties. Today, the civil war that would be 
adequate to effect transfer of power and a reconstitu- 
tion of society at large, as understood by official Com- 
munists, would seem to present but one possible 
consequence: the ruin of all parties and the destruction 
of civilized life. This fact alone is enough to lead us to 
consider the potentialities of the method of intelligence. 

The argument for putting chief dependence upon 
violence as the method of effecting radical change is, 
moreover, usually put in a way that proves altogether 
too much for its own case. It is said that the dominant 
economic class has all the agencies of power in its hands, 
directly the army, militia and police; indirectly, the 
courts, schools, press and radio. I shall not stop to an- 
alyze this statement. But if one admits it to be valid, the 
conclusion to be drawn is surely the folly of resorting 
to a use of force against force that is so well intrenched. 
The positive conclusion that emerges is that conditions 
that would promise success in the case of use of force 



SOCIAL ACTION 85 

are such as to make possible great change without any 
great recourse to such a method.* 

Those who uphold the necessity of dependence upon 
violence usually much oversimplify the case by setting 
up a disjunction they regard as self-evident. They say 
that the sole alternative is putting our trust in parlia- 
mentary procedures as they now exist. This isolation of 
law-making from other social forces and agencies that 
are constantly operative is wholly unrealistic. Legisla- 
tures and congresses do not exist in a vacuum — not even 
the judges on the bench live in completely secluded 
sound-proof chambers. The assumption that it is pos- 
sible for the constitution and activities of law-making 
bodies to persist unchanged while society itself is under- 
going great change is an exercise in verbal formal logic. 

It is true that in this country, because of the interpre- 
tations made by courts of a written constitution, our 
political institutions are unusually inflexible. It is also 
true, as well as even more important (because it is a 
factor in causing this rigidity) that our institutions, 
democratic in form, tend to favor in substance a priv- 
ileged plutocracy. Nevertheless, it is sheer defeatism to 
assume in advance of actual trial that democratic politi- 
cal institutions are incapable either of further develop- 
ment or of constructive social application. Even as they 
now exist, the forms of representative government are 

* It should be noted that Marx himself was not completely committed 
to the dogma of the inevitability of force as the means of effecting 
revolutionary changes in the system of “social relations.” For at one 
^ time he contemplated that the change might occur in Great Britain and 
(J ) the United States, and possibly in Holland, by peaceful means. 



86 LIBERALISM AND 

potentially capable of expressing the public will when 
that assumes anything like unification. Anil them is 
nothing inherent in them that forbids their supplementa- 
tion by political agencies that represent definitely eco- 
nomic social interests, like those of producers and 
consumers* 

The final argument in behalf of the use of intelli- 
gence is that as are the means used so are the actual ends 
achieved — that is, the consequences. I know of no greater 
fallacy than the claim of those who hold to the dogma of 
the necessity of brute force that this use will be the 
method of calling genuine democracy into existence— 
of which they profess themselves the simon-pure ad- 
herents. It requires an unusually credulous faith in the 
Hegelian dialectic of opposites to think that all of a 
sudden the use of force by a class will he transmuted 
into a democratic classless society. Force breeds counter- 
force; the Newtonian law of action and reaction still 
holds in physics, and violence is physical. To profess 
democracy as an ultimate ideal and the suppression oi 
democracy as a means to the ideal may be possible 
in a country that has never known even rudimentary 
democracy, hut when professed in a country that has 
anything of a genuine democratic spirit in its tradi- 
tions, it signifies desire for possession and retention of 
power by a class, whether that class be called Fascist 
or Proletarian. In the light of what happens in non- 
democratic countries, it is pertinent to ask whether die 
rule of a class signifies the dictatorship of the majority, 
or dictatorship over the chosen class by a minority party ; 



SOCIAL ACTION 87 

whether dissenters are allowed even within the class the 
party claims to represent; and whether the development 
of literature and the other arts proceeds according to a 
formula prescribed by a party in conformity with a 
doctrinaire dogma of history and of infallible leader- 
ship, or whether artists are free from regimentation? 
Until these questions are satisfactorily answered, it is 
permissible to look with considerable suspicion upon 
those who assert that suppression of democracy is the 
road to the adequate establishment of genuine democ- 
racy. The one exception — and that apparent rather than 
real — to dependence upon organized intelligence as the 
method for directing social change is found when so- 
ciety through an authorized majority has entered upon 
the path of social experimentation leading to great social 
change, and a minority refuses by force to permit the 
method of intelligent action to go into effect. Then force 
may be intelligently employed to subdue and disarm the 
recalcitrant minority. 

There may he some who think I am unduly dignify- 
ing a position held by a comparatively small group by 
taking their arguments as seriously as I have done. But 
their position serves to bring into strong relief the alter- 
natives before us. It makes clear the meaning of renas- 
cent liberalism. The alternatives are continuation of drift 
with attendant improvisations to meet special emer- 
gencies; dependence upon violence; dependence upon 
socially organized intelligence. The first two aherna* 
tives, however, are not mutually exclusive, for if things 
are allowed to drift the result may be some sort of social 



83 LIBERALISM AND 

change effected by the use of force, whether so planned 
or not. Upon the whole, the recent policy of liberalism 
has been to further “social legislation”; that is, meas- 
ures which add performance of social services to the 
older functions of government. The value of this addi- 
tion is not to be despised. It marks a decided move away 
from laissez faire liberalism, and has considerable im- 
portance in educating the public mind to a realization 
of the possibilities of organized social control. It has 
helped to develop some of the techniques that in any case 
will be needed in a socialized economy. But the cause 
of liberalism will be lost for a considerable period if it 
is not prepared to go further and socialize the forces of 
production, now at hand, so that the liberty of indi- 
viduals will be supported by the very structure of eco- 
nomic organization. 

The ultimate place of economic organization in hu- 
man life is to assure the secure basis for an ordered 
expression of individual capacity and for the satisfac- 
tion of the needs of man in non-economic directions. 
The effort of mankind in connection with material pro- 
duction belongs, as I said earlier, among interests and 
activities that are, relatively speaking, routine in char- 
acter, “routine” being defined as that which, without 
absorbing attention and energy, provides a constant 
basis for liberation of the values of intellectual, esthetic 
and companionship life. Every significant religious and 
moral teacher and prophet has asserted that the material 
is instrumental to the good life. Nominally at least, this 
idea is accepted by every civilized community. The 



SOCIAL ACTION 89 

transfer of the burden of material production from 
human muscles and brain to steam, electricity and 
chemical processes now makes possible the effective 
actualization of this ideal. Needs, wants and desires are 
always the moving force in generating creative action. 
When these wants are compelled by force of conditions 
to be directed for the most part, among the mass of man- 
kind, into obtaining the means of subsistence, what 
should be a means becomes perforce an end in itself. 
Up to the present the new mechanical forces of produc- 
tion, which are the means of emancipation from this 
state of affairs, have been employed to intensify and 
exaggerate the reversal of the true relation between 
means and ends. Humanly speaking, I do not see how 
it would have been possible to avoid an epoch having 
this character. But its perpetuation is the cause of the 
continually growing social chaos and strife. Its termina- 
tion cannot be effected by preaching to individuals that 
they should place spiritual ends above material means. 
It can be brought about by organized social reconstruc- 
tion that puts the results of the mechanism of abundance 
at the free disposal of individuals. The actual corrosive 
“materialism” of our times does not proceed from sci- 
ence. It springs from the notion, sedulously cultivated 
by the class in power, that the creative capacities of 
individuals can be evoked and developed only in a strug- 
gle for material possessions and material gain. We 
either should surrender our professed belief in the su- 
premacy of ideal and spiritual values and accommodate 
our beliefs to the predominant material orientation, or 



90 LIBERALISM AND 

we should through organized endeavor institute the 
socialized economy of material security and plenty thal 
will release human energy for pursuit of higher values. 

Since liberation of the capacities of individuals for 
free, self-initiated expression is an essential part of the 
creed of liberalism, liberalism that is sincere must will 
the means that condition the achieving of its ends. 
Regimentation of material and mechanical forces is the 
only way by which the mass of individuals can be re- 
leased from regimentation and consequent suppression 
of their cultural possibilities. The eclipse of liberalism 
is due to the fact that it has not faced the alternatives and 
adopted the means upon which realization of its pro- 
fessed aims depends. Liberalism can be true to its ideals 
only as it takes the course that leads to their attainment. 
The notion that organized social control of economic 
forces lies outside the historic path of liberalism shows 
that liberalism is still impeded by remnants of its earlier 
laissez faire phase, with its opposition of society and the 
individual. The thing which now dampens liberal ardor 
and paralyzes its efforts is the conception that liberty and 
development of individuality as ends exclude the use of 
organized social effort as means. Earlier liberalism re- 
garded the separate and competing economic action of 
individuals as the means to social well-being as the end. 
We must reverse the perspective and see that socialized 
economy is the means of free individual development as 
the end. 

That liberals are divided in outlook and endeavor 
while reactionaries are held together by community of 



91 



SOCIAL ACTION 
interests and the ties of custom is well-nigh a common- 
place. Organization of standpoint and belief among lib- 
erals can be achieved only in and by unity of endeavor. 
Organized unity of action attended by consensus of be- 
liefs will come about in the degree in which social control 
of economic forces is made the goal of liberal action. 
The greatest educational power, the greatest force in 
shaping the dispositions and attitudes of individuals, is 
the social medium in which they live. The medium that 
now lies closest to us is that of unified action for the 
inclusive end of a socialized economy. The attainment of 
a state of society in which a basis of material security 
will release the powers of individuals for cultural expres- 
sion is not the work of a day. But by concentrating upon 
the task of securing a socialized economy as the ground 
and medium for release of the impulses and capacities 
men agree to call ideal, the now scattered and often con- 
flicting activities of liberals can be brought to effective 
unity. 

It is no part of my task to outline in detail a program 
for renascent liberalism. But the question of “what is to 
be done” cannot be ignored. Ideas must be organized, 
and this organization implies an organization of indi- 
viduals who hold these ideas and whose faith is ready 
to translate itself into action. Translation into action 
signifies that the general creed of liberalism be formu- 
lated as a concrete program of action. It is in organiza- 
tion for action that liberals are weak, and without this 
organization there is danger that democratic ideals may 
go by default. Democracy has been a fighting faith. 



LIBERALISM AND 



92 

When its ideals are reenforced by those of scientific 
method and experimental intelligence, it cannot be 
that it is incapable of evoking discipline, ardor and 
organization. To narrow the issue for the future to a 
struggle between Fascism and Communism is to invite a 
catastrophe that may carry civilization down in the 
struggle. Vital and courageous democratic liberalism is 
the one force that can surely avoid such a disastrous 
narrowing of the issue. I for one do not believe that 
Americans living in the tradition of Jefferson and Lin- 
coln will weaken and give up without a whole-hearted 
effort to make democracy a living reality. This, I repeat, 
involves organization. 

The question cannot be answered by argument. Ex- 
perimental method means experiment, and the question 
can be answered only by trying, by organized effort. 
The reasons for making the trial are not abstract or 
recondite. They are found in the confusion, uncertainty 
and conflict that mark the modern world. The reasons 
for thinking that the effort if made will be successful 
are also not abstract and remote. They lie in what the 
method of experimental and cooperative intelligence has 
already accomplished in subduing to potential human 
use the energies of physical nature. In material produc- 
tion, the method of intelligence is now the established 
rule; to abandon it would be to revert to savagery. The 
task is to go on, and not backward, until the method 
of intelligence and experimental control is the rule 
in social relations and social direction. Either we take 
this road or we admit that the problem of social organi- 



SOCIAL ACTION 93 

zation in behalf of human liberty and the flowering of 
human capacities is insoluble. 

It would be fantastic folly to ignore or to belittle the 
obstacles that stand in the way. But what has taken place, 
also against great odds, in the scientific and industrial 
revolutions, is an accomplished fact ; the way is marked 
out. It may be that the way will remain untrodden. If so, 
the future holds the menace of confusion moving into 
chaos, a chaos that will be externally masked for a time 
by an organization of force, coercive and violent, in 
which the liberties of men will all but disappear. Even 
so, the cause of the liberty of the human spirit, the cause 
of opportunity of human beings for full development of 
their powers, the cause for which liberalism enduringly 
stands, is too precious and too ingrained in the human 
constitution to be forever obscured. Intelligence after 
millions of years of errancy has found itself as a method, 
and it will not be lost forever in the blackness of night. 
The business of liberalism is to bend every energy and 
exhibit every courage so that these precious goods may 
not even be temporarily lost but be intensified and ex- 
panded here and now. 



